


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Best life insurance plans and rates | LifePlans.com

































Compare the Top Online Life InsuranceCarriers in Michigan 














Coverage as Low as $15 a Month!











Rates in less than 2 Minutes. 100% Free,Safe, and Secure!








Life Insurance Helps the Ones You Love with:

Mortgage Payments
College Tuition
Outstanding Debt
Monthly Income




The Lowest Rates and Best Coverage

LifePlans.com is dedicated to helping you find the best life insurance policy, while saving you as much money as possible! How do we do that? Simply put, our technology and relationships are what enable us to pass the savings onto you.
Life insurance companies are constantly calculating and updating rates based on the changing demographics of the US population. LifePlans.com is connected to the databases of the leading carriers to help you find the best deal while using the most up-to-date rates.
What’s better is that our service is 100% free, and super-fast! All you have to do is:


1. Confirm your zip code.
2. Tell us about yourself and your coverage needs.
3. See your custom-results and start comparing multiple quotes.


As you are shopping around, there are certain questions that you should ask yourself. The best one to start with is: “How much coverage do I need?”  To give you an idea, most people opt for a Term Policy with about $250,000 in coverage. Why this amount or any amount for that matter? The answer is that it all depends on how much debt you would need to payoff and how much income you would need to replace in the event you are no longer around to provide for your loved ones.
Another good question to ask yourself, or one of the several qualified agents LifePlans.com can connect you with, is how long do want to be covered and whether an investment component in your policy is right for you. Unlike a term policy, which as its name suggests has rates and coverage based on a set term or number of years, a Permanent Policy does not expire. Typically, Whole Life, the most common type of permanent insurance, not only serves to pay-out your beneficiaries upon your passing, but also has a current cash value that can be borrowed against or cashed-out anytime. Essentially,               permanent policies are investments and can grow in value whereas term policies do not.  The catch is that they often have higher premiums. You can learn more about life insurance and policy types by clicking on the icons below.
So with flexible policy options plus the best rates and coverage, don’t wait any longer. Secure your coverage now with LifePlans.com and get back to living your life with those who matter most!




Learn More
Get more information about life insurance and the different types of policies:







Life Insurance Overview






Life Insurance Calculator






 Term Life Insurance 






Final Expense





Universal Life Insurance





Whole Life Insurance





About Us

LifePlans.com is a marketplace connecting people with insurance companies and the agents/brokers of insurance companies. LifePlans.com does not provide quotes or sell insurance directly to consumers, is not affiliated with any exchange, and is not a licensed insurance agent or broker. Accordingly, you should not send us (via mail or email) any sensitive information, including personal health information or applications. Any such communications will not be treated as confidential and will be discarded.
The information presented on LifePlans.com is intended for general consumer knowledge. We do not provide advice on individual situations or legal issues.



Get Started!















*Disclaimer: All quotes and rates are for illustration purposes. Actual premiums and coverage will be based on age, gender, health history, certain underwriting criteria, state of residence, and tobacco usage. Certain policies may require a medical exam. Not all policies or companies are available in all states. Advertised products are for US residents only.









LifePlans.com | 
				
				Contact Us
				
				 | Terms of Use
				 | Privacy Policy

Copyright © 2013 - 2017 LifePlans.com, all rights reserved.


LifePlans.com, 2381 Rosecrans Ave, Suite 400,El Segundo, CA 90245 | info@LifePlans.com



 

    








 












Privacy Policy 
Privacy Policy
Effective Date: February 1, 2016

Our Practices Regarding Privacy
Healthplans.com LLC, through its LifePlans.com website (“Site”) is committed to ensuring the privacy and security of each user that visits our website. Your privacy rights are important to us and we are committed to respecting your online privacy and making sure that any information you share with us by using our website is properly protected.
We have established this LifePlans.com Privacy Policy so you know the importance we place on your privacy and so you can understand how we collect and use information collected from you when you visit our website or submit any personally identifiable information to us. This policy describes our overall privacy practices regarding information we collect on our web sites and through other Internet mediums. Our policy does not apply to the practices of companies that we do not own or control.
Data We Collect
When you visit our website, we collect personally identifiable information (“PII”) and non-personally identifiable information through various sources.  PII means any information that may be used to identify an individual, including but not limited to name, address, and telephone number.  Non-PII is data that is not used to specifically identify, contact or locate an individual, including but not limited to zip code, gender, and age.
When you use the Site, we automatically collect certain information from you, such as your browser type (e.g., Internet Explorer, Safari, Chrome); your Internet domain, (e.g., Comcast, Time Warner, etc.); your computer’s operating system, (e.g., Windows, Macintosh, UNIX, Linux); referring and exit page; operating system; the type of mobile device you use (if applicable); your mobile device’s unique device ID; and your IP address.  This information lets us see how users find our Site, and it tells us which pages users visit most frequently so we can make our Site more useful. We keep this information for an indefinite amount of time to improve the operation of our Site and to provide better services to our users.
In addition to the data that your browser or Internet session sends us automatically, we may also collect PII if you enter it when using our website. This contact information is stored on our servers and used to fulfill your information request. If you have not opted out of its use, we may share it with our data licensees, including our advertising clients and their vendors, and other advertising partners.
How We Use and Share Your Information
We may use the information we collect from and about you for the following purposes:  (1) to fulfill your requests for information; (2) to respond to your inquiries; (3) to review Site usage and operations; (4) to address problems with the Site, our business, or our services; (5) to protect the security or integrity of the Site and our business; (6) to monitor the Site for compliance with our Terms of Use and the law; (7) to help improve our Site or services; and (8) to contact you with Site updates, newsletters and other informational and promotional materials from us and third party marketing offers from our trusted partners, as well as from other companies.
We may disclose information collected from and about you as follows: (1) to our related companies and service providers, to perform a business, professional or technical support function for us; (2) to our marketing partners, advertisers or other third parties, who may contact you with their own offers; (3) as necessary if we believe that there has been a violation of our Terms of Use or of our rights or the rights of any third party; (4) to respond to legal process (such as a search warrant, subpoena or court order) and provide information to law enforcement agencies or in connection with an investigation on matters related to public safety, as permitted by law, or otherwise as required by law; and (5) in the event that our company or substantially all of its assets are acquired, your personal information may be one of the transferred assets. We may also disclose your personal information with your express consent. We may share aggregate, non-personally identifiable information about Site users with third parties.
Third Parties Contacting You
Different advertisers and advertising companies have different methods of following up with you on information requests. Some send brochures in the mail, others reply via email or some may contact you by telephone. By using our service to request information from our advertising clients and advertising partners, you are giving permission to Healthplans.com LLC and these parties (or their partners and vendors) to contact you using the methods of their choice, even if the phone number you provide is in a corporate, state, or national do not call list, now or in the future (unless and until you opt-out from receiving communications from us or such partners, as applicable).  You are also providing your express consent to be called or texted (including prerecorded messages or using an autodialer or automated means) at the number you provide.
Cookies
Our websites use cookies (small files containing program code that reside on your computer), to provide usage statistics about our web site, and to understand where visitors learn about our web site. We also may use cookies to simplify the re-entering of your data. You can adjust your browser settings to opt out of the use of cookies by having your browser disable cookies. Look for the cookie options in your browser in the Options or Preferences menu.
Additionally, we use cookies, web beacons, and other technologies to receive and store certain types of information whenever you interact with us through your computer or mobile device on the Site. This information, which may include the pages you visit on our or our partners’ sites, which web address you came from, the type of browser/device/hardware you are using, or an IP-based geographic location, helps us recognize you, customize your website experience and make marketing messages more relevant. These companies use non-personally identifiable information (e.g., click stream information, browser type, time and date, hardware/software information) during your visits to this and other websites in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of greater interest to you. At this time, we do not respond to browser “do not track” signals. However, we may provide you with ways to choose not to have your information collected or used in this way. To learn more about targeted ads or to opt-out of this type of advertising, visit the Network Advertising Initiative website or Digital Advertising Alliance website.
Opt-Out of Receiving Communications from LifePlans.com
You may opt out by contacting us by submitting a “Stop contacting me” request on our Contact Us page; calling us at (310) 219-6202; or sending a letter to: Healthplans.com LLC, 2381 Rosecrans Ave., Suite 400, El Segundo, CA 90245.
Children’s Privacy
We do not direct the Site to, nor do we knowingly collect any PII from, any individuals less than thirteen years of age. If you are the parent or guardian and are made aware that a child under the age of 13 has provided us with PII, please contact us.
Third Party Links
This Site may contain links that direct you to websites owned and operated by other companies. LifePlans.com does not control or endorse these websites, and we do not assume any responsibility for the content, privacy policies or practices of any third party websites, which may use cookies and collect PII from you.  We recommend that you review the privacy policy posted on any external website before disclosing any PII.  Please contact those websites directly if you have any questions about their privacy policies.
California Privacy Rights
Under California’s “Shine the Light” law, we provide a method for consumers to “opt-out” of having their information shared with third-parties. Contact us using the methods described in the “Contact Us” section to unsubscribe.
Privacy Policy Changes
LifePlans.com may change this Privacy Policy at any time. Should we revise this Privacy Policy in the future, we will immediately publish the amended Privacy Policy on our website. We recommend that you check our website frequently to view recent changes or updates.
Contact Us
We invite you to contact us if you have questions or comments about our Privacy Policy or you want to change the personally identifiable information you have provided to us. You may contact us by:
Sending a letter to: Healthplans.com LLC, 2381 Rosecrans Ave., Suite 400, El Segundo, CA 90245
Calling us at (310) 219-6202
Emailing us at: legal@healthplans.com
If we need, or are required to, contact you regarding your personal information, we may do so by telephone, email, or mail.


Terms Of Use 
Terms of Use
Effective Date: February 9, 2017
Please read these terms and conditions of use before using this site.
The LifePlans.com website (“LifePlans.com” or the “Site”) is owned and operated by Healthplans.com LLC (“Healthplans.com”). By using this Site, you signify your assent to these Terms of Use (“Terms” or “Agreement”). If you do not agree to all of these Terms, do not use this site.
BY ACCESSING OR USING ANY PART OF THE SITE, YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE READ, UNDERSTAND AND AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THIS AGREEMENT. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO BE SO BOUND, DO NOT ACCESS OR USE THE SITE. PLEASE READ THESE TERMS CAREFULLY. THEY CONTAIN A MANDATORY ARBITRATION PROVISION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER.
Use of the Website
By using the Site, you represent to LifePlans.com that 1) you are authorized to enter into this Agreement and you are at least the age of majority in your state or province of residence; (2) you will not use the Site for any purpose or in any manner that violates any law or regulation or that infringes the rights of Healthplans.com or any third party; (3) any information or data provided to Healthplans.com by you will not violate any law or regulation or infringe the rights of Healthplans.com or any third party; (4) all information that you provide to us in connection with the Site (e.g., name, e-mail address, and other information) is true and accurate; and (5) you are authorized and able to fulfill and perform the obligations and meet the conditions of a user as specified herein. This Agreement provides to you a personal, revocable, limited, non-exclusive, royalty-free, non-sublicenseable, non-transferable license to use the Site conditioned on your continued compliance with the Terms of this Agreement. You may print and download materials and information from the Site solely for your personal use, provided that all hard copies contain all copyright and other applicable notices contained in such materials and information. Notwithstanding the foregoing, you may not modify, translate, decompile, create derivative work(s) of, copy, distribute, disassemble, broadcast, transmit, publish, remove or alter any proprietary notices or labels, license, sublicense, transfer, sell, mirror, frame, exploit, rent, lease, private label, grant a security interest in, or otherwise use the Website in any manner not expressly permitted herein. Specifically, and by way of illustration and not limitation, you may not (a) separate and use any graphics, photographs, or other audio, visual, or video elements from the accompanying text or material without the prior express written permission of Healthplans.com and/or its licensor(s); (b) use any “deep link,” “page scrape,” “robot,” “spider,” or other device, program, script, algorithm, or methodology to access, acquire, copy, or monitor any portion of the Site or in any way reproduce or circumvent the navigational structure of the Site to obtain or attempt to obtain any materials, documents, or information through any means not purposely made available through the Site; (c) probe, scan, or test the vulnerability of the Site or any network connected to the Site; (d) use any device, software, or routine to interfere with the proper working of the Site or any transaction conducted on the Site; (e) forge headers, impersonate a person, or otherwise manipulate identifiers in order to disguise your identity or the origin of any message or transmittal you send to Healthplans.com on or through the Site; (f) use the Site to harvest or collect e-mail addresses or other contact information; or (g) use the Site in a manner that could damage, disparage, or otherwise negatively impact Healthplans.com. The licenses granted by Healthplans.com terminate if you do not comply with these Terms.
The material, images, and text on the Site (“Content”) is protected by copyright under both United States and foreign laws. Title to the Content remains with LifePlans.com or its licensors. Any use of the Content not expressly permitted by these Terms and Conditions is a breach of this Agreement and may violate copyright, trademark, and other laws. Content and features are subject to change or termination without notice in the editorial discretion of LifePlans.com. All rights not expressly granted herein are reserved to LifePlans.com and its licensors. If you violate any of these Terms, your permission to use the Content automatically terminates and you must immediately destroy any copies you have made of any portion of the Content.
Privacy
Please review our Privacy Policy to understand our practices regarding personal information provided by you, which is incorporated herein by reference.
Limitation of Liability and Disclaimer of Warranties
The use of the Site and the Content is at your own risk. When using the Site, information will be transmitted over a medium that may be beyond the control and jurisdiction of LifePlans.com and its suppliers. Accordingly, LifePlans.com assumes no liability for or relating to the delay, failure, interruption, or corruption of any data or other information transmitted in connection with use of the Site. The Site and the content are provided on an “as is” and “as available” basis and may include errors, omissions, or other inaccuracies. MOREOVER, Healthplans.com MAY MAKE MODIFICATIONS ANY/OR CHANGES ON THIS SITE OR IN THE MATERIALS AND INFORMATION AVAILABLE ON THIS SITE AT ANY TIME AND FOR ANY REASON. Healthplans.com MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS, GUARANTEES, OR WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, AS TO THE SUITABILITY, COMPLETENESS, TIMELINESS, RELIABILITY, LEGALITY, OR ACCURACY OF THE Healthplans.com SERVICES OR THE INFORMATION, CONTENT, MATERIALS, PRODUCTS, OR OTHER SERVICES, OR INCLUDED ON OR OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE ON THE SITE. YOU EXPRESSLY AGREE THAT YOUR USE OF THE SITE IS AT YOUR OWN RISK. TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMISSIBLE BY APPLICABLE LAW, Healthplans.com DISCLAIMS ALL WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND FITNESS FOR PARTICULAR PURPOSE. Healthplans.com DOES NOT WARRANT THAT THE INFORMATION, CONTENT, MATERIALS, PRODUCTS OR OTHER SERVICES INCLUDED ON OR OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE TO YOU THROUGH THE SITE, Healthplans.com’S SERVERS, OR ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS SENT FROM Healthplans.com ARE FREE OF VIRUSES OR OTHER HARMFUL COMPONENTS. Healthplans.com ALSO MAKES NO REPRESENTATION, GUARANTEE, OR WARRANTY THAT THIS WEBSITE WILL OPERATE ERROR FREE OR IN AN UNINTERRUPTED FASHION.
To the maximum extent permitted by law, in no event shall LifePlans.com, its licensors, its suppliers, or any third parties mentioned on the Site be liable for any damages (including, without limitation, indirect, punitive, special, incidental, or consequential damages, personal injury/wrongful death, lost profits, or damages resulting from lost data or business interruption) resulting from the use of or inability to use the Site or the Content, the delay or inability to use the Site, or from any information, Content, materials, or Healthplans.com services included on or otherwise made available to you through the Site, whether based in contract, tort, strict liability, or otherwise, and whether or not Healthplans.com, its licensors, its suppliers, or any third parties mentioned on the Site have been advised of the possibility of such damages. Healthplans.com, its licensors, its suppliers, or any third parties mentioned on the Site shall be liable only to the extent of actual damages incurred by you, not to exceed U.S. $100. Any claims arising in connection with your use of the Site or any Content must be brought within one (1) year of the date of the event giving rise to such action occurred. NOTWITHSTANDING ANYTHING IN THESE TERMS TO THE CONTRARY, THIS DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES AND LIMITATION OF LIABILITY DO NOT APPLY IN NEW JERSEY.
User Submissions
You agree that you will not upload or transmit any communications or content of any type to the Site that infringe or violate any rights of any party. By submitting communications or content to the Site, you agree that such submission is non-confidential for all purposes. If you make any submission to the Site or if you submit any business information, idea, concept or invention to LifePlans.com by email, you automatically grant-or warrant that the owner of such content or intellectual property has expressly granted Healthplans.com a royalty-free, perpetual, irrevocable, sublicensable world-wide nonexclusive license to use, reproduce, create derivative works from, modify, publish, edit, translate, distribute, perform, and display the communication or content in any media or medium, or any form, format, or forum now known or hereafter developed. If you wish to keep any business information, ideas, concepts or inventions private or proprietary, do not submit them to the Site or to LifePlans.com by email.
Advertisements, Searches, and Links to Other Sites
LifePlans.com may provide links to third-party websites. LifePlans.com also may select certain websites as priority responses to search terms you enter and LifePlans.com may agree to allow advertisers to respond to certain search terms with advertisements or sponsored content. LifePlans.com does not endorse the content on any third-party websites. LifePlans.com is not responsible for the content of linked third-party sites, sites framed within the Site, third-party websites provided as search results, or third-party advertisements, and does not make any representations regarding their content or accuracy. Your use of third-party websites is at your own risk and subject to the terms and conditions of use and privacy policies for such websites.
Electronic Communications
When you use the Site, or send e-mails to us, you are communicating with us electronically. You consent to receive communications from us electronically. We will communicate with you by e-mail or by posting notices on or through the Site. You agree that all agreements, notices, disclosures and other communications that we provide to you electronically satisfy any legal requirement that such communications be in writing.
Governing Law
These Terms are governed by the laws of the State of California, without respect to its conflict of laws principles.
Arbitration
All disputes arising out of or relating to any purchase you make with via this Site, any information you provide via the Site, these Terms (including the formation, performance or alleged breach), and your use of the Site will be exclusively resolved under confidential binding arbitration in accordance with the Rules of the American Arbitration Association (“AAA”), including the AAA’s Supplementary Procedures for Consumer-Related Disputes (collectively, the “AAA Rules”) then in effect at the time of the dispute. The AAA Rules are available at www.adr.org or by calling 1-800-778-7879. If you initiate arbitration, Healthplans.com will promptly reimburse you for any standard filing fee which may have been required under AAA Rules once you have notified Healthplans.com in writing and provided a copy of the arbitration proceedings. However, if Healthplans.com is the prevailing party in the arbitration, applicable law may allow the arbitrator to award attorneys’ fees and costs to Healthplans.com. If for any reason the AAA is unavailable, the parties shall mutually select another arbitration forum. The arbitration will be conducted in the city of Los Angeles, California, but may proceed telephonically if the claimant so chooses.
The arbitrator’s award will be binding and may be entered as a judgment in any court of competent jurisdiction. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, no arbitration under these Terms may be joined to an arbitration involving any other party subject to these Terms, whether through class arbitration proceedings or otherwise. Notwithstanding the foregoing, we will have the right to seek injunctive or other equitable relief in state or federal court located to enforce these Terms or prevent an infringement of a third party’s rights. In the event equitable relief is sought, each party hereby irrevocably submits to the personal jurisdiction of such court.
Waiver of Class Action Rights
ANY DISPUTES ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO YOUR USE OF THIS SITE, ANY INFORMATION YOU PROVIDE VIA THE SITE, THESE TERMS (INCLUDING THEIR FORMATION, PERFORMANCE OR ALLEGED BREACH), AND YOUR USE OF THE SITE SHALL BE SUBMITTED INDIVIDUALLY BY YOU, AND SHALL NOT BE SUBJECT TO ANY CLASS ACTION OR REPRESENTATIVE STATUS. BY ENTERING INTO THIS AGREEMENT, YOU HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVE ANY RIGHT YOU MAY HAVE TO JOIN CLAIMS WITH THOSE OF OTHERS or participate as a member of a class of claimants with respect to any claim submitted to arbitration. The parties to this arbitration agreement acknowledge that this class action waiver is material and essential to the arbitration of any disputes between the parties and is nonseverable from the agreement to arbitrate claims. If any portion of this class action waiver is limited, voided, or cannot be enforced, then the parties’ agreement to arbitrate shall be null and void. YOU UNDERSTAND THAT BY AGREEING TO THIS CLASS ACTION WAIVER, YOU MAY ONLY BRING CLAIMS AGAINST Healthplans.com IN AN INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY AND NOT AS A PLAINTIFF OR CLASS MEMBER IN ANY PURPORTED CLASS ACTION OR REPRESENTATIVE PROCEEDING.
YOU UNDERSTAND THAT YOU WOULD HAVE HAD A RIGHT TO LITIGATE THROUGH A COURT, TO HAVE A JUDGE OR JURY DECIDE YOUR CASE AND TO BE PARTY TO A CLASS OR REPRESENTATIVE ACTION. HOWEVER, YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE TO HAVE ANY CLAIMS DECIDED INDIVIDUALLY AND ONLY THROUGH ARBITRATION.
You shall have thirty (30) days from the date that you submit your personally identifiable information to opt-out of this arbitration agreement. To opt out of arbitration you must email us at legal@healthplans.com. If more than thirty (30) days have passed, you are not eligible to opt out of arbitration.
Notice and Take Down Procedures; Copyright Agent
If you believe any materials accessible on or from the Site infringe your copyright, you may request removal of those materials (or access thereto) from this web site by contacting LifePlans.com’s copyright agent (identified below) and providing the following information:
Identification of the copyrighted work that you believe to be infringed. Please describe the work, and where possible include a copy or the location (e.g., URL) of an authorized version of the work.
A description, in reasonable detail (including the applicable URL) of the material that you believe to be infringing and its location. Please provide us with enough information that will allow us to locate the material.
Your name, address, telephone number and (if available) e-mail address.
A statement that you have a good faith belief that the complained-of use of the materials is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent, or the law.
A statement by you, made under the penalty of perjury, that the information that you have supplied is accurate, and indicating that you are the copyright owner or are authorized to act on the copyright owner’s behalf.
A signature or the electronic equivalent from the copyright holder or authorized representative.
Please send this notice to:
Attn: LifePlans.com Legal
2381 Rosecrans Ave., Suite 400
El Segundo, California 90245
Email: legal@healthplans.com
Complete Agreement
Except as expressly provided in a particular “legal notice” on the Site or via e-mail from Healthplans.com LLC or LifePlans.com, this Agreement and the LifePlans.com Privacy Policy constitute the entire agreement between you and LifePlans.com with respect to the use of the Site and Content.
If any provision of this Agreement is found to be invalid by any court having competent jurisdiction, the invalidity of such provision shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions of this Agreement, which shall remain in full force and effect. No waiver of any of these Terms shall be deemed a further or continuing waiver of such term or condition or any other term or condition.
Contact Us
Thank you for your cooperation. We hope you find the Site helpful and convenient to use! Questions or comments regarding this website, including any reports of non-functioning links, should be submitted through our Contact Us page.

© 2017 LifePlans.com All rights reserved



    //www.lifeplans.com/ lifeplans.com LifePlans.com 2017




mutualsfundsguidance.com














Putnam Investments - Mutual funds, Institutional, and 529


































About Putnam

Our company
Executive team
Board of Trustees
Proxy voting
Newsroom
Careers
Our culture
Organization
Early career programs
Benefits
Open positions



Contact us
























The Fed may be ahead of the curve


Q3 2017 | Capital Markets Outlook
As the market digests the Fed's latest rate increase, a long-anticipated surge in inflation remains elusive.
Find out why »






You may also be interested in:

Q3 2017 | Fixed Income Outlook
In the United States, we see an increasing amount of evidence pointing toward late-cycle economic conditions.
Find out why  »


Q3 2017 | Equity Outlook
For U.S. equity investors, the second quarter offered a number of familiar themes: relatively low volatility, new record highs for major indexes, and a modest advance for stocks.
Find out why  »












View all Putnam funds »




Income funds for a changing rate outlook
+
–



Putnam Short Duration Income Fund
Putnam Absolute Return 100 Fund
Putnam Absolute Return 300 Fund
Putnam Diversified Income Trust







Equity funds that can gain from growth
+
–



Putnam Equity Income Fund
Putnam Growth Opportunities Fund







Tax-exempt income funds
+
–



Putnam Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam Tax-Free High Yield Fund







Funds with risk-reducing diversification
+
–



Putnam Absolute Return 500 Fund
Putnam Dynamic Asset Allocation Balanced Fund
Putnam Dynamic Asset Allocation Growth Fund












IDEAS FOR WEALTH MANAGEMENT







Don’t lose sight of discretionary spending in retirement plan















Advisor-only Webcast
|
Distinctly different: How to brand yourself in a world of sameness
|
July 19, 2017
|
1:15pm ET






Listen to replay











60-second Insights


See all videos »








Learn how interest-rate risk dominates indexes


Explore an unconstrained bond portfolio


See how unconstrained funds outperformed during rising rate periods


Fixed Income Outlook Q3 2017









Look for secular trends that can sustain earnings


Explore a growth portfolio with a thematic approach


Equity Outlook Q3 2017









Software as a service can change a business


Explore a global technology portfolio


Equity Outlook Q3 2017










Financial advisors:

Explore fund ideas, analyze portfolios, and create presentations with this free, open architecture tool.
Download the app or use now:



On your iPad

App Store




Launch FundVisualizer

Login required













Our commitment to performance excellence
Putnam Investments is proud to partner with world-class athletes, teams, and organizations who share our:

Belief in teamwork
Dedication to winning
Focus on performance




















New England Patriots


Boston Celtics


Ted Ligety & U.S. Ski and snowboard assoc.


Keegan Bradley  Brendan Steele  Jon Curran












 



Mutual Funds
















 























×
LinkedIn allows you to select who can see your connections.


Learn more
By making your connections visible:

Your connections can see your network and ask for introductions
You can ask your connections for introductions
You can fully participate in the LinkedIn social ecosystem and continually build your network

Decide who you want to connect with on LinkedIn:

Your shared connections are always visible, no matter what setting you choose
Consider removing some connections if you don't want them to see your network.










Putnam Investments - Financial Advisor




Login
Register
About Putnam
Contact us









 






Mutual funds



Absolute Return
Asset Allocation
Global Sector
Growth




Blend
Taxable Income
Tax-free Income
Value




Pricing and performance
Pricing policies
Historical pricing
Prospectuses/fund documents




See all mutual funds


Other investments

Closed-end funds
Annuities
Non-U.S. funds



FundVisualizer
 
Select a Putnam fund to compare
Putnam Growth Opportunities Fund
Putnam Pennsylvania Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam Global Sector Fund
Putnam Multi-Cap Core Fund
Putnam Capital Spectrum Fund
Putnam Global Equity Fund
Putnam Equity Spectrum Fund
Putnam George Putnam Balanced Fund
Putnam Global Income Trust
Putnam Global Health Care Fund
Putnam Short Duration Income Fund
Putnam Dynamic Risk Allocation Fund
Putnam High Yield Fund
Putnam Floating Rate Income Fund
Putnam Multi-Cap Growth Fund
Putnam New Jersey Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2060 Fund
Putnam Absolute Return 700 Fund
Putnam Government Money Market Fund (A Shares)
Putnam Absolute Return 500 Fund
Putnam Equity Income Fund
Putnam Europe Equity Fund
Putnam American Government Income Fund
Putnam Dynamic Asset Allocation Conservative Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2055 Fund
Putnam Dynamic Asset Allocation Balanced Fund
Putnam New York Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam Dynamic Asset Allocation Growth Fund
Putnam Retirement Income Fund Lifestyle 1
Putnam Ohio Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam International Equity Fund
Putnam Small Cap Value Fund
Putnam Massachusetts Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam Diversified Income Trust
Putnam Convertible Securities Fund
Putnam California Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam Global Financials Fund
Putnam Small Cap Growth Fund
Putnam Global Consumer Fund
Putnam International Capital Opportunities Fund
Putnam International Value Fund
Putnam Global Telecommunications Fund
Putnam Global Natural Resources Fund
Putnam Money Market Fund (A Shares)
Putnam Global Technology Fund
Putnam Global Industrials Fund
Putnam Capital Opportunities Fund
Putnam Tax-Free High Yield Fund
Putnam Global Utilities Fund
Putnam U.S. Government Income Trust
Putnam Research Fund
Putnam Minnesota Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam AMT-Free Municipal Fund
Putnam Absolute Return 300 Fund
Putnam Absolute Return 100 Fund
Putnam Short-Term Municipal Income Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2030 Fund
Putnam International Growth Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2045 Fund
Putnam Intermediate-Term Municipal Income Fund
Putnam Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2050 Fund
Putnam Income Fund
Putnam Multi-Cap Value Fund
Putnam Low Volatility Equity Fund
Putnam Emerging Markets Income Fund
Putnam Emerging Markets Equity Fund
Putnam Investors Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2020 Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2025 Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2035 Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2040 Fund


Tax Center

Year-end distributions
Help with tax forms
Fund tax data





Our fundamental approach
Only an active approach can offer more than the market. Our portfolio managers invest with conviction based on fundamental research and a proactive view of risk.

All managers


Insights on investing

Revisiting "Thinking outside the index" (PDF)
Independent equity research: How we do it, and why it matters (PDF)



Manager spotlight


D. William Kohli
Chief Investment Officer, Fixed Income discusses how his background in quantitative analysis contributes to his approach to investing in dynamic markets.
Watch video »











Latest perspective


Value benefits from an expanding economy
Value stocks have lagged the market in 2017, but if the economy continues to expand, rates rise, and the yield curve steepens, this trend could reverse.






See all Perspectives posts


Market updates

60-second Insights
Weekly economic update
Webcasts and conference calls
Market Perspectives



Outlooks and research

Capital Markets Outlook
Fixed Income Outlook
Equity Outlook
Investment insights
Infographics





Help clients maneuver in markets.





More resources:

Putnam fund managers discuss the current investment environment.
Navigate changing rates by going beyond the indexes
Invest for tax-exempt income
Diversifying with asset allocation
Diversifying with absolute return






More ideas for your clients

Saving for college
Saving for retirement
Diversifying with income funds
Diversifying with global allocation
Diversifying with absolute return





FundVisualizer®



View over 30,000 funds, ETFs, and indexes
Build and compare portfolios
Import fund data
Create presentations
Free for advisors









Launch FundVisualizer | View a demo from our webcast replay




Tools and calculators

Order literature
CD vs. municipal bond calculator
Hypothetical expense calculator


See all tools


Frequently requested forms

Mutual Fund Account Application (PDF)
Designation of Beneficiary (PDF)
IRA forms and applications


See all forms




Ideas for wealth management


Don’t lose sight of discretionary spending in retirement plan
Planning for both discretionary spending as well as essential expenses is important when saving for retirement.






See all Wealth Management posts


Resources for you

Social media survey
Social media training
Advisor Tech Tips
Practice management
Continuing education
Portfolio Solutions



Resources for your clients

Order literature
Investor education
Client seminars





Over 75 years serving investors through advisors


To navigate complex financial markets, investors deserve an ally. Study after study confirms that investors benefit from working with financial advisors who can help develop and maintain a long-term strategy.



About our commitment to you



Standards of excellence
Supporting your efforts




Content for you and your clients
Your Putnam team
Backed by Great-West Lifeco







Why log in?
Login to access and manage your client information through Putnam's Daily Statement view or DST Vision.


Help logging in
For login assistance, please call support services at
 1-800-354-2228


Log in for account access via DST Vision



User ID





Password







 Remember me




Login




To create or reset a DST Vision ID, call: 1-800-354-2228. Non-U.S. advisors, call: +1 617-292-1000 x43051. (M-F, 8:30 a.m. - 7:00 p.m. ET)








 


Home
Mutual funds





Putnam Mutual Funds
Managed strategies for pursuing investors' goals
At Putnam, both traditional and alternative strategies are inspired by our independent approach to investment research. We look for value beyond mainstream benchmark indexes, pursue new drivers of return, and take a broader view of market risk with the goal of reducing volatility.
Explore our products to build a diversified portfolio.




Compare Putnam funds with industry peers on FundVisualizer®, then share insights with your clients.


 

All funds
Trending
FundVisualizer comparison
Fund commentary







Fund search:









|Filter



Clear all
Close



Absolute Return
Asset Allocation
Blend
Global Sector
Growth
Taxable Income
Tax-free Income
Value

Morningstar Ratings (5-year)









Above-Lipper Median



Annualized Returns (before sales charge)
between



%


and



%



Time period


10 yrs./Life
5 yrs.
3 yrs.
1 yr.




Portfolio Managers

All Portfolio Managers
Aaron M. Cooper, CFA 
Adrian H. Chan, CFA 
Albert Chan, CFA 
Andrew J. Yoon CFA
Anthony J. Daigle 
Brett S. Kozlowski, CFA 
Christopher J. Eitzmann 
D. William Kohli 
Daniel J. Graña, CFA 
Daniel Schiff 
Darren A. Jaroch, CFA 
David L. Diamond, CFA 
David L. Glancy 
Di Yao 
Elizabeth Hansen McGuire 
Emily E. Shanks 
Eric N. Harthun, CFA 
Garrett L. Hamilton, CFA 
Gerard P. Sullivan 
Isabel Buccellati 
Jacquelyne J. Cavanaugh 
James A. Fetch 
James A. Polk, CFA 
Jason R. Vaillancourt, CFA 
Jatin Misra PhD, CFA
Jeffrey B. Sacknowitz, CFA 
Joanne M. Driscoll, CFA 
Jonathan M. Topper 
Joshua H. Fillman 
Karan S. Sodhi, CFA 
Kathryn B. Lakin 
Michael J. Atkin 
Michael J. Lima, CFA 
Michael J. Maguire, CFA 
Michael V. Salm 
Neil P. Desai 
Norman P. Boucher 
Paul D. Scanlon, CFA 
Paul M. Drury, CFA 
Robert J. Kea, CFA 
Robert J. Schoen 
Robert L. Davis, CFA 
Robert L. Salvin 
Robert M. Brookby 
Ryan W. Kauppila 
Samuel Cox 
Shep Perkins, CFA 
Simon Davis 
Spencer Morgan, CFA 
Vivek Gandhi, CFA 
Walter D. Scully, CPA 
William C. Rives 
William J. Monroe, CFA 



Viewing:  




Share Class



Select
A
B
C
M
R
R5
R6
T1
Y




Y share annualized returns as of 06/30/17
Cumulative Returns as of 06/30/17
Volatility & Risk (A and Y shares only)
Profile
Morningstar Ratings
Lipper Rankings
Up-market Capture Ratio (A and Y shares only)
Down-market Capture Ratio (A and Y shares only)
Information Ratio (A and Y shares only)


Before sales charge
After sales charge




Please note: B Shares are closed to new investors



 
Fund 
Ticker 
Asset class 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
Beta 
R2 
Std. Dev. 
Sharpe Ratio 
Alpha 
Expense Ratio 
Total Assets ($m) 
Turnover Ratio 
Overall 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 

Compare

Track









10 most-viewed funds:

-1 year ago



-9 months ago



-6 months ago



-3 months ago


Now






1
2




3
4


5
6


7


8
9


10










† The benchmark shown is a "best fit" benchmark assigned by Morningstar. Morningstar does not calculate benchmark performance for funds with a blended, or combined primary benchmark. For more information on the Fund's benchmark, please click on the prospectus link above. 
Powered by Morningstar.
Morningstar data is shown as of the most recent reporting period by each fund family. Allocations may not equal 100% and will vary overtime. Assets contained within "Other" category are not classified by Morningstar. All information presented in this tool is for informational purposes only and is not intended to be investment advice. The information is not meant to be an offer to sell or a recommendation to buy any investment product. Unless otherwise noted, performance is shown before sales charge. For more fund information, click the prospectuses button.
All information is historical and not indicative of future results. Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. After-sales-charge returns reflect the maximum sales charge applicable to the fund, which can be found within the Table Chart. Performance may not reflect any expense limitation or subsidies currently in effect. Short-term trading fees may apply. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit Morningstar.com.
This material is for informational and educational purposes only. It is not a recommendation of any specific investment product, strategy, or decision, and is not intended to suggest taking or refraining from any course of action. It is not intended to address the needs, circumstances, and objectives of any specific investor. Putnam, which earns fees when clients select its products and services, is not offering impartial advice in a fiduciary capacity in providing this sales and marketing material. This information is not meant as tax or legal advice. Investors should consult a professional advisor before making investment and financial decisions and for more information on tax rules and other laws, which are complex and subject to change.
Not FDIC insured | May lose value | No bank guarantee








‡ As of May 8, 2017, Putnam High Yield Advantage Fund was renamed to Putnam High Yield Fund.


Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com. 



Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Returns before sales charge do not reflect the current maximum sales charges as indicated below. Had the sales charge been reflected, returns would be lower. Returns at public offering price (after sales charge) for class A and class M shares reflect the current maximum initial sales charges of 5.75% and 3.50% for equity funds and Putnam Absolute Return 500 Fund and 700 Fund, and 4.00% and 3.25% for income funds (1.00% and 0.75% for Putnam Floating Rate Income Fund and Putnam Absolute Return 100 Fund and 300 Fund), respectively. Class B share returns reflect the applicable contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC), which is 5% in the first year, declining to 1% in the sixth year, and is eliminated thereafter (except for Putnam Floating Rate Income Fund, which is 3% in the first year, declining to 1% in the fourth year, and is eliminated thereafter). Class C shares reflect a 1% CDSC the first year that is eliminated thereafter. Performance for class B, C, M, R, T, and Y shares prior to their inception is derived from the historical performance of class A shares, adjusted for the applicable sales charge (or CDSC) and, except for class Y shares, the higher operating expenses for such shares (with the exception of Putnam Tax-Free High Yield Fund and Putnam AMT-Free Municipal Fund, which are based on the historical performance of class B shares). Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. Class A, M, and T shares of Putnam money market funds have no initial sales charge. For a portion of the periods, some funds had expenses limitations or had been sold on a limited basis with limited assets and expenses, without which returns would be lower. 



Lipper rankings are based on total return without sales charge relative to all share classes of funds with similar objectives as determined by Lipper. Past performance is not indicative of future results. Rankings for other periods can be found on the Facts & Rankings tab.



For each fund with at least a three-year history, Morningstar calculates a Morningstar Rating based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a fund's monthly performance (including the effects of sales charges, loads, and redemption fees), placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of funds in each category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. (Each share class is counted as a fraction of one fund within this scale and rated separately, which may cause slight variations in the distribution percentages.) The Overall Morningstar Rating for a fund is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its 3–, 5–, and 10–year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. Data is historical. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Rankings for other periods can be found on the Facts & Rankings tab.



























Research Fund Performance with FundVisualizer - Putnam Investments



































Download FundVisualizer®

On your iPad

App Store






Winner - Appy Awards 2017









Menu






FundVisualizer is an advisor-only tool that streamlines your fund research with intuitive controls and powerful features.




Analyze funds from across the industry
Assess the impact that correlation can have on your portfolio
Easily import your fund data
Share with clients




Explore new investment opportunities
Create and model custom hypotheticals
Model portfolio performance
Build out your library of custom charts




LAUNCH TOOL
DOWNLOAD











 
Your browser does not support the video tag.



















Analyze funds from across the industry
Evaluate more than 30,000 funds, ETFs, and indexes, using over 80 performance and risk metrics, and compare funds and portfolios directly from your desktop or tablet.

Make head-to-head comparisons of funds or create and model portfolios
Access from any modern web browser or from your iPad











Explore new investment opportunities
Use the all-new fund explorer feature and find similar funds based on the same share class and Morningstar category.

Filter your results to find potential new opportunities for your clients
Easily add any fund from the results page to a new comparison











Compare correlation to uncover hidden portfolio risk
Diversifying by market cap, geography, or investment style may not be enough.
The traditional model for building a diversified portfolio may not be adequate in today's market. Adding small-cap stocks to a large-cap portfolio, combining growth stocks with value stocks, or even supplementing a U.S.-focused fund mix with international or emerging-market equities may not create the level of diversification desired. The reason: high correlations across markets and investment styles over the past several years.
Use FundVisualizer to compare the correlation between two portfolios and fund-to-fund correlation to uncover hidden portfolio risk.










Create and model custom hypotheticals
Use the compare feature to create two portfolios and then model accumulation or withdrawal outcomes by entering custom dollar amounts for periodic contributions or withdrawals.










Easily import your fund data
Copy and paste, drag and drop, or browse and upload all your fund tickers and portfolio allocations from a spreadsheet to save for easy comparisons later.










Model portfolio performance
Research the returns of different allocation models across a variety of historical market conditions to see the impact of tweaks to your clients' portfolio mixes.

Easily generate portfolio comparisons in just four clicks
Save comparisons to your personal library











Share with clients
Intuitive controls make it easy to create shareholder-approved reports customized for your clients.

Download, save, and print client proposals
Email directly to your clients from the application











Build out your library of custom charts
Generate individual and custom portfolio comparisons, build a personal chart library, and save to keep your research organized.

Use the platform you prefer: desktop or iPad
Save charts with custom names organized into custom folders












Powered by Morningstar.
All information presented in this tool is for informational purposes only and is not intended to be investment advice. The information is not meant to be an offer to sell or a recommendation to buy any investment product.
All funds involve risk, and you can lose money. See the prospectus for details.
Your clients should carefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges, and expenses of a fund before investing. For a prospectus, or a summary prospectus if available, containing this and other information for any fund, please call Putnam Dealer Marketing Services at 1-800-354-4000. Your clients should read the prospectus carefully before investing.
For complete fund data and performance as of the most recent calendar quarter-end, click the "Prospectus" button.
All information is historical and not indicative of future results. Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. After-sales-charge returns reflect the maximum sales charge applicable to the fund. Performance may not reflect any expense limitation or subsidies currently in effect. Short-term trading fees may apply. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit Morningstar.com.
This material is for informational and educational purposes only. It is not a recommendation of any specific investment product, strategy, or decision. It is not intended to suggest taking or refraining from any course of action, nor is it customized to address the needs, circumstances and objectives of any specific investor. In providing this material, Putnam is not providing impartial advice in a fiduciary capacity. The material is part of Putnam’s sales and marketing activities. Putnam earns fees when clients select its products and services. Investors should consult a professional advisor before making investment and financial decisions.
Not FDIC insured | May lose value | No bank guarantee
© 2011-2017, Putnam Retail Management











 



Mutual Funds - Putnam Investments


































Putnam Investments - Individual Investors


Login
About Putnam
Contact Us










 



Email
Facebook
Twitter
Google+
LinkedIn


Home
Mutual funds




Putnam Mutual Funds




Managed strategies for pursuing your goals

At Putnam, both traditional and alternative strategies are inspired by our independent approach to investment research. We look for value beyond mainstream benchmark indexes, pursue new drivers of return, and take a broader view of market risk with the goal of reducing volatility.

Explore our products to build a diversified portfolio.



Top 5 most viewed funds

Capital Spectrum Fund
Diversified Income Trust
Equity Spectrum Fund
Equity Income Fund
Dynamic Asset Allocation Balanced Fund










Fund Search:









|Filter



Clear all
Close



Absolute Return
Asset Allocation
Blend
Global Sector
Growth
Taxable Income
Tax-free Income
Value

Morningstar Ratings (5-year)









Above-Lipper Median



Annualized Returns (before sales charge)
between



%


and



%



Time period


10 yrs./Life
5 yrs.
3 yrs.
1 yr.




Portfolio Managers

All Portfolio Managers
Aaron M. Cooper, CFA 
Adrian H. Chan, CFA 
Albert Chan, CFA 
Andrew J. Yoon CFA
Anthony J. Daigle 
Brett S. Kozlowski, CFA 
Christopher J. Eitzmann 
D. William Kohli 
Daniel J. Graña, CFA 
Daniel Schiff 
Darren A. Jaroch, CFA 
David L. Diamond, CFA 
David L. Glancy 
Di Yao 
Elizabeth Hansen McGuire 
Emily E. Shanks 
Eric N. Harthun, CFA 
Garrett L. Hamilton, CFA 
Gerard P. Sullivan 
Isabel Buccellati 
Jacquelyne J. Cavanaugh 
James A. Fetch 
James A. Polk, CFA 
Jason R. Vaillancourt, CFA 
Jatin Misra PhD, CFA
Jeffrey B. Sacknowitz, CFA 
Joanne M. Driscoll, CFA 
Jonathan M. Topper 
Joshua H. Fillman 
Karan S. Sodhi, CFA 
Kathryn B. Lakin 
Michael J. Atkin 
Michael J. Lima, CFA 
Michael J. Maguire, CFA 
Michael V. Salm 
Neil P. Desai 
Norman P. Boucher 
Paul D. Scanlon, CFA 
Paul M. Drury, CFA 
Robert J. Kea, CFA 
Robert J. Schoen 
Robert L. Davis, CFA 
Robert L. Salvin 
Robert M. Brookby 
Ryan W. Kauppila 
Samuel Cox 
Shep Perkins, CFA 
Simon Davis 
Spencer Morgan, CFA 
Vivek Gandhi, CFA 
Walter D. Scully, CPA 
William C. Rives 
William J. Monroe, CFA 



Viewing:  




Share Class



A
B
C
M
R
R5
R6
T1
Y




Annualized Returns as of 06/30/17
Cumulative Returns as of 06/30/17
Volatility & Risk (A and Y shares only)
Profile
Morningstar Ratings
Lipper Rankings
Up-market Capture Ratio (A and Y shares only)
Down-market Capture Ratio (A and Y shares only)
Information Ratio (A and Y shares only)


Before sales charge
After sales charge




Please note: B Shares are closed to new investors



 
Fund 
Ticker 
Asset Class 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
Beta 
R2 
Std. Dev. 
Sharpe Ratio 
Alpha 
Expense Ratio 
Total Assets ($m) 
Turnover Ratio 
Overall 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 








‡ As of May 8, 2017, Putnam High Yield Advantage Fund was renamed to Putnam High Yield Fund.

Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com. Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Returns before sales charge do not reflect the current maximum sales charges as indicated below. Had the sales charge been reflected, returns would be lower. Returns at public offering price (after sales charge) for class A and class M shares reflect the current maximum initial sales charges of 5.75% and 3.50% for equity funds and Putnam Absolute Return 500 Fund and 700 Fund, and 4.00% and 3.25% for income funds (1.00% and 0.75% for Putnam Floating Rate Income Fund and Putnam Absolute Return 100 Fund and 300 Fund), respectively. Class B share returns reflect the applicable contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC), which is 5% in the first year, declining to 1% in the sixth year, and is eliminated thereafter (except for Putnam Floating Rate Income Fund, which is 3% in the first year, declining to 1% in the fourth year, and is eliminated thereafter). Class C shares reflect a 1% CDSC the first year that is eliminated thereafter. Performance for class B, C, M, R, T, and Y shares prior to their inception is derived from the historical performance of class A shares, adjusted for the applicable sales charge (or CDSC) and, except for class Y shares, the higher operating expenses for such shares (with the exception of Putnam Tax-Free High Yield Fund and Putnam AMT-Free Municipal Fund, which are based on the historical performance of class B shares). Performance for class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. Class A, M, and T shares of Putnam money market funds have no initial sales charge. For a portion of the periods, some funds had expense limitations or had been sold on a limited basis with limited assets and expenses, without which returns would be lower.


For each fund with at least a three-year history, Morningstar calculates a Morningstar Rating based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a fund's monthly performance (including the effects of sales charges, loads, and redemption fees), placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of funds in each category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. (Each share class is counted as a fraction of one fund within this scale and rated separately, which may cause slight variations in the distribution percentages.) The Overall Morningstar Rating for a fund is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its 3–, 5–, and 10–year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. Data is historical. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.


Lipper rankings are based on total return without sales charge relative to all share classes of funds with similar objectives as determined by Lipper. Past performance is not indicative of future results. Rankings for other periods can be found on the Facts & Rankings tab.
















skip to main content


Franklin Templeton Variable Insurance Products Trust (FTVIPT)














 




























Go

































Print 



Share 








Social 


Twitter




Facebook




LinkedIn




Close




Email 

Email















Franklin Templeton Variable Insurance Products Trust (FTVIPT)






Prospectuses and Reports
Each FTVIP Fund is a series of Franklin Templeton Variable Insurance Products Trust.
FTVIPT funds are not offered or sold to the public. For more information about these funds contact your financial advisor or the insurance company offering your variable contract.
XBRL documents are available as .zip archive files. You need a zip extractor application to access these files.
Dates indicate the most recent update to the document, including any amendments or supplements.
Important Legal Information, including site Terms of Use



 Share Class 1Share Class 2Share Class 4Share Class 5




Franklin Flex Cap Growth VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
 
729-PSUM
702-PSUM
 


Prospectus
 
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
 
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
 
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
 
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
—
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



Franklin Founding Funds Allocation VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
783-PSUM
784-PSUM
701-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



 Share Class 1Share Class 2Share Class 4Share Class 5




Franklin Global Real Estate VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
771-PSUM
772-PSUM
 
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
 
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
 
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
 
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—
—



Franklin Growth and Income VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
767-PSUM
768-PSUM
 
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
 
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
 
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
 
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—
—



 Share Class 1Share Class 2Share Class 4Share Class 5




Franklin High Income VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
777-PSUM
778-PSUM
707-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



Franklin Income VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
769-PSUM
770-PSUM
708-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



 Share Class 1Share Class 2Share Class 4Share Class 5




Franklin Large Cap Growth VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
721-PSUM
722-PSUM
 
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
 
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
 
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
 
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—
—



Franklin Mutual Global Discovery VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
753-PSUM
754-PSUM
736-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



 Share Class 1Share Class 2Share Class 4Share Class 5




Franklin Mutual Shares VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
743-PSUM
744-PSUM
737-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



Franklin Rising Dividends VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
773-PSUM
774-PSUM
731-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



 Share Class 1Share Class 2Share Class 4Share Class 5




Franklin Small Cap Value VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
775-PSUM
776-PSUM
732-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



Franklin Small-Mid Cap Growth VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
723-PSUM
724-PSUM
733-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



 Share Class 1Share Class 2Share Class 4Share Class 5




Franklin Strategic Income VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
779-PSUM
780-PSUM
734-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



Franklin U.S. Government Securities VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
781-PSUM
782-PSUM
 
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
 
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
 
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
 
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—
—



 Share Class 1Share Class 2Share Class 4Share Class 5




Franklin VolSmart Allocation VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
 
792-PSUM
 
795-PSUM


Prospectus
 
792-P
 
VIP5-P


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
 
VIP-SAI
 
VIP-SAI


Annual Report
 
VIP2-A
 
VIP5-A


Semiannual Report
 
VIP2-S
 
VIP5-S


XBRL
—
ZIP (20MB)
—
ZIP (20MB)



Templeton Developing Markets VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
717-PSUM
718-PSUM
738-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



 Share Class 1Share Class 2Share Class 4Share Class 5




Templeton Foreign VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
719-PSUM
720-PSUM
785-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



Templeton Global Bond VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
741-PSUM
742-PSUM
787-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—



Templeton Growth VIP Fund


Summary Prospectus
739-PSUM
740-PSUM
788-PSUM
 


Prospectus
VIP1-P
VIP2-P
VIP4-P
 


Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
VIP-SAI
 


Annual Report
VIP1-A
VIP2-A
VIP4-A
 


Semiannual Report
VIP1-S
VIP2-S
VIP4-S
 


XBRL
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
ZIP (20MB)
—










Important Legal Information
This communication is general in nature and provided for educational and informational purposes only. It should not be considered or relied upon as legal, tax or investment advice or an investment recommendation, or as a substitute for legal or tax counsel. Any investment products or services named herein are for illustrative purposes only, and should not be considered an offer to buy or sell, or an investment recommendation for, any specific security, strategy or investment product or service. As a financial professional, only you can provide your customers with personalized advice and investment recommendations tailored to their specific goals, individual situation, and risk tolerance.
Franklin Templeton does not provide legal or tax advice. Federal and state laws and regulations are complex and subject to change, which can materially impact results. FTDI cannot guarantee that such information is accurate, complete or timely; and disclaims any liability arising out of your use of, or any tax position taken in reliance on, such information.
Access to our website may be unavailable or delayed from time to time and during periods of unusual market activity.
Shares of the insurance funds of the Franklin Templeton Variable Insurance Products Trust (FTVIPT) are not offered to the public; they are offered and sold only to: (1) insurance company separate accounts to serve as the underlying investment vehicles for variable contracts; (2) certain qualified plans; and (3) other mutual funds (funds of funds).
Fund documents are provided on this page to satisfy certain regulatory requirements in connection with the use of a fund's summary prospectus only and do not constitute a recommendation, a solicitation, or offer for a particular fund.
Not all FTVIPT funds and classes of shares are available in all variable insurance contracts. For information on the terms of investment in a contract, please contact your financial advisor or the insurance company offering your variable contract or consult your contract prospectus that accompanies or precedes the FTVIPT fund prospectus.
For more information on any of the FTVIPT funds, contact your financial advisor or download the prospectus listed above, which contains important information about the fund's investment goals, sales charges, expenses and risks. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing. Franklin Templeton Distributors, Inc. One Franklin Parkway, San Mateo, CA 94403.






You need Adobe Acrobat Reader to view and print PDF documents. Download a free version from Adobe's website.
Franklin Templeton Distributors, Inc.





This website is for US residents.









Careers


Help


Site Usage and Accessibility


Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


Anti-Corruption Policy



Copyright © 2017 Franklin Templeton Investments. All Rights Reserved.





Connect with us:

Facebook




LinkedIn



YouTube



Twitter







Top







Close 




                                    You have  in your cart







View cart to edit items, select amounts and checkout





CONTINUE BROWSING



View Cart











CLOSE 



Mandatory Items will be removed


 is associated with the following mandatory items in your cart.



Uncheck any items you wish to keep in your cart





CANCEL



REMOVE ALL CHECKED ITEMS











Alert! You are about to be signed out.


There are literature items in your cart. If you sign out, all items will be removed.

Click "Stay Signed In" to continue your session and keep items in your cart.
Otherwise, click Sign out to end your session and empty your cart.





                                               Sign Out
                                     


Stay Signed In













You can compare a maximum of 4 funds.
Money funds and liquidated funds cannot be added to comparison.





CANCEL














 CLOSE X



















Quarterly commentary discussing fund performance.
View more details







Facebook




Twitter




LinkedIn




Email












Client Use:


(FINRA Letter)



Literature Code:



Format:

 ()


Publication Date:



Next Update:

















Download
Download Unavailable





Add to Cart
Hardcopy Unavailable





 View Cart
                                                        












 




Mutual Fund and Variable Insurance Trust - Rational Insider Buying VA Fund: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 26, 2017 9:53 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Mutual Fund and Variable Insurance Trust - Rational Insider Buying VA Fund



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Mutual Fund and Variable Insurance Trust - Rational Insider Buying VA Fund is an open-ended variable annuity equity mutual fund launched and managed by Rational Advisors, Inc. The fund invests in the public equity markets across the globe. It seeks to invest in the stocks of companies operating across diversified sectors. The fund invests in the growth and value stocks of companies across all market capitalizations with a focus on large-cap companies. It employs a combination of fundamental and quantitative analysis focusing on factors like political, social or economic factors or population demographics, company’s product, management, competitive strategy, historical earnings, revenue, and ...
Mutual Fund and Variable Insurance Trust - Rational Insider Buying VA Fund is an open-ended variable annuity equity mutual fund launched and managed by Rational Advisors, Inc. The fund invests in the public equity markets across the globe. It seeks to invest in the stocks of companies operating across diversified sectors. The fund invests in the growth and value stocks of companies across all market capitalizations with a focus on large-cap companies. It employs a combination of fundamental and quantitative analysis focusing on factors like political, social or economic factors or population demographics, company’s product, management, competitive strategy, historical earnings, revenue, and cash flow to create its portfolio. The fund benchmarks the performance of its portfolio against the Standard & Poor’s 500 Total Return Index. It uses proprietary research to create its portfolio. The fund was formerly known as Mutual Fund and Variable Insurance Trust - Catalyst Insider Buying VA Fund. Mutual Fund and Variable Insurance Trust - Rational Insider Buying VA Fund was formed on May 1, 2004 and is domiciled in the United States.
Detailed Description


36 North New York AvenueHuntington, NY 11743United StatesFounded in 2004



Phone: 800-253-0412








Key Executives for Mutual Fund and Variable Insurance Trust - Rational Insider Buying VA Fund




Mr. Anthony J. Ghoston


      	Chief Executive Officer
      


Age: 58
        







Mr. David Resor Carson


      	Chief Compliance Officer and Anti-Money Laundering Officer
      


Age: 58
        







Mr. Joel B. Engle


      	Treasurer
      


Age: 52
        







Ms. Alicia G. Powell


      	Secretary
      


Age: 41
        







Mr. David S. Miller


      	Portfolio Manager
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Mutual Fund and Variable Insurance Trust - Rational Insider Buying VA Fund Key Developments

The Huntington Funds - Huntington VA Situs Fund, Special/Extraordinary Shareholders Meeting, Dec 18, 2015
Nov 13 15
The Huntington Funds - Huntington VA Situs Fund, Special/Extraordinary Shareholders Meeting, Dec 18, 2015., at 14:00 US Eastern Standard Time. Location: 2960 North Meridian Street. Agenda: To elect three Trustees to serve on the Board of Trustees until the next meeting of shareholders at which Trustees are elected; to approve an Advisory Agreement between the Trust and Huntington Asset Advisors, Inc. (to be renamed Rational Advisors, Inc.); to approve an Advisory Agreement between the Trust and Huntington Asset Advisors, Inc. (to be renamed Rational Advisors, Inc.); to approve a Distribution Plan under Rule 12b-1 with regard to each VA Fund; to approve a proposal to permit Rational Advisors, Inc., as the investment advisor to all the Funds and the VA Funds, to rely on an exemptive order to hire and replace sub-advisors or to modify sub-advisory agreements without shareholder approval; and to consider any other business as may properly come before the meeting or any adjournment(s) thereof.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Mutual Fund and Variable Insurance Trust - Rational Insider Buying VA Fund, please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


























 

Variable Insurance Trust




































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








Log in






(0)









Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          






















































								Variable Insurance Trust
							



An experienced team of professionals focused on helping clients grow their variable annuity business. Expertise helping clients access practical resources and solutions that can adapt to changing market environments and capitalize on new opportunities.





Overview
Performance
Prices
Characteristics
Literature




    
      













 










Sales Library


Access fund literature, sales tools and education materials to use with your clients.   


 View Materials







				Brochure
			

Goldman Sachs Family of Variable Insurance Trust Funds.



 
											Download Brochure 
												

		     											PDF
													










				VIT Global Trends Allocation 
			

Learn more about a dynamic investment strategy that may help you navigate changing markets. 



 
											Enhanced Fact Card 
												

		     											PDF
													










				Featured Documents
			


 
											GSAM VIT FUNDS - PERFORMANCE AT A GLANCE 
												

		     											PDF
													









Contact Us

 

		
		For more information on our subadvisory services, please visit our Institutional site or contact a GSAM relationship manager.

GSAMSubadvisoryTeam@gs.com



Back to top 











Asset Class Legend


 Alternatives
                        

 Commodities
                        

 Equity
                        

 Fixed Income
                        

 Money Markets
                        


                            Portfolio Solutions
                        

 Real Estate/Infrastructure
                        




















                        
                        
                            Market Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Market Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Asset Class Views
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research
		           		 
					     
						    







                        
                        
                            Products
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Mutual Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Exchange-Traded Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Closed-End Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Variable Insurance Trusts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Separately Managed Accounts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Liquidity Solutions
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Resources
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Advisor Resources
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Investment Ideas
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Portfolio Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Defined Contribution Investment Only
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Client Service
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Literature
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Literature Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Tax Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Forms and Applications
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Regulatory Documents
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Fact Cards
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Our Firm
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        About GSAM
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Citizenship
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Recognition
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               


















































  


				Email
				

					Note: Separate multiple email addresses with a comma or semicolon.
				














						Your Name
					



						Your Email Address
					







Send

					Send
				 






						Send me a copy
					


















 





Product/Fund Performance & Regulatory Documents - MassMutual




















































MassMutual
Log In
Logout

























 



Product/Fund Performance & Regulatory Documents
Get monthly/quarterly performance, fact sheets, summary prospectuses, prospectuses, and annual/semiannual reports.











Select product or fund type:






Select product or fund type:




Annuities (variable)





MassMutual Transitions Select (SM) II


MassMutual Capital Vantage®


MassMutual Transitions Select (SM) (no longer sold)


MassMutual Evolution (SM) (no longer sold)


MassMutual Artistry


MassMutual RetireEase Select (SM) (no longer sold)


MassMutual Equity Edge (SM) (no longer sold)


Panorama Passage® (no longer sold)


MassMutual Transitions® (no longer sold)


Panorama Premier (no longer sold)


Flex Extra (no longer sold)


Panorama® (no longer sold)


Panorama Plus (no longer sold)


LifeTrust (no longer sold)







Executive Benefits





MassMutual Electrum (SM) (SL18)


Strategic Group Variable Universal Life® II (SGVUL II)


Strategic Group Variable Universal Life® (SGVUL)


Strategic Variable Life® Plus (SL10)


Strategic Variable Life® (SL9)


Large Case Variable Life Plus® (SL6)







Life Insurance (variable)





Variable Universal Life III (VUL III)


VUL Guard (SM)


Survivorship VUL Guard (SM)


Variable Universal Life II (VUL II)


Survivorship Variable Universal Life II (SVUL II)


Variable Universal Life (VUL)


Survivorship Variable Universal Life (SVUL)


Variable Life Select (VLS)


Variable Life Plus (VLP)


Variable Life (VLI)


The Blue Chip Company's Variable Universal Life (BCVUL)







MML Series Investment Fund*





MML Aggressive Allocation Fund


MML American Funds® Core Allocation Fund


MML American Funds® Growth Fund


MML American Funds® International Fund


MML Balanced Allocation Fund


MML Blue Chip Growth Fund


MML Conservative Allocation Fund


MML Equity Income Fund


MML Equity Index Fund


MML Focused Equity Fund


MML Foreign Fund


MML Fundamental Growth Fund


MML Fundamental Value Fund


MML Global Fund


MML Growth Allocation Fund


MML Growth & Income Fund (ClassI)


MML Income & Growth Fund


MML International Equity Fund


MML Large Cap Growth Fund


MML Managed Volatility Fund


MML Mid Cap Growth Fund


MML Mid Cap Value Fund


MML Moderate Allocation Fund


MML Small Cap Growth Equity Fund


MML Small Company Value Fund


MML Small/Mid Cap Value Fund


MML Total Return Bond







MML Series Investment Fund II*





MML Asset Momentum Fund


MML Blend Fund


MML Dynamic Bond Fund


MML Equity Fund


MML Equity Rotation Fund


MML High Yield Fund


MML Inflation-Protected and Income Fund


MML Managed Bond Fund


MML Short-Duration Bond Fund


MML Small Cap Equity Fund


MML Special Situations Fund


MML Strategic Emerging Markets Fund


MML U.S. Government Money Market Fund







MassMutual Premier Funds**





Premier Balanced Fund


Premier Core Bond Fund


Premier Disciplined Growth Fund


Premier Disciplined Value Fund


Premier Diversified Bond Fund


Premier Global Fund


Premier High Yield Fund


Premier Inflation-Protected and Income Fund


Premier International Equity Fund


Premier Main Street Fund


Premier Short Duration Bond Fund


Premier Small Cap Opportunities Fund


Premier Strategic Emerging Markets Fund


Premier U.S. Government Money Market Fund


Premier Value Fund







MassMutual Select Funds**





MM MSCI EAFE® International Index Fund


MM RetireSMART 2010 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2015 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2020 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2025 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2030 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2035 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2040 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2045 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2050 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2055 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2060 Fund


MM RetireSMART Conservative Fund


MM RetireSMART Growth Fund


MM RetireSMART In Retirement Fund


MM RetireSMART Moderate Fund


MM RetireSMART Moderate Growth Fund


MM Russell 2000® Small Cap Index Fund


MM S&P® 500 Index Fund


MM S&P® Mid Cap Index Fund


Select Blackrock Global Allocation Fund


Select Blue Chip Growth Fund


Select Diversified Value Fund


Select Equity Opportunities Fund


Select Fundamental Growth Fund


Select Fundamental Value Fund


Select Growth Opportunities Fund


Select Large Cap Value Fund


Select Mid Cap Growth Fund


Select Mid Cap Value Fund


Select Overseas Fund


Select Small Cap Growth Equity Fund


Select Small Cap Value Equity Fund


Select Small Company Growth Fund


Select Small Company Value Fund


Select Strategic Bond Fund


Select Total Return Bond Fund







MassMutual IRA 














View information on our Electronic Delivery Program



Looking for retirement plan (i.e., 401k) performance? Log in to RetireSmartSM 






Related Information



Holdings within funds in MML Series Investment Fund and MML Series Investment Fund II (PDF)


Holdings for the MassMutual Premier Funds and MassMutual Select Funds (PDF)


Proxy voting record for holdings within funds in MML Series Investment Fund and MML Series Investment Fund II


Proxy voting record for the MassMutual Premier Funds and MassMutual Select Funds


MassMutual Select Funds Information Statement (PDF)


Portfolio Holdings Disclosures for the MML U.S. Government Money Market Fund (PDF)


Portfolio Holdings Disclosures for the MassMutual Premier U.S. Government Money Market Fund (PDF)


Statistical Information for the MML U.S. Government Money Market Fund


Statistical Information for the MassMutual Premier U.S. Government Money Market Fund


Provision of Financial Support to MML U.S. Government Money Market Fund (PDF)


Information regarding reduced sales charges for Class A shares of the MassMutual Premier Funds and MassMutual Select Funds (PDF)


Compensation Arrangements









Please call 1-888-309-3539 or email fundinfo@massmutual.com to report problems accessing the underlying fund summary prospectuses, prospectuses, and annual/semiannual reports (“disclosure documents”), problems with saving or printing these online disclosure documents, and/or any other technological issues that may arise related to viewing the online fund disclosure documents.
* These funds are underlying funds of MassMutual's variable life and variable annuity products and are not available for retail sale.
** These funds are only available for sale to retirement plans and other eligible institutional investors. They are not available for retail sale. To obtain the most recent quarterly Due Diligence Report or other information available for any of the MassMutual Premier and MassMutual Select Funds, please contact RS Investment Performance and Reporting.
Sales of all variable annuity and variable life insurance products must be preceded or accompanied by the current prospectuses for the products and their investment choices, which contain more information on charges, expenses, risks, and investment objectives. Please read them carefully before you invest or send money. These prospectuses are available through the above links. Contact your registered representative if you have any questions.
Insurance products issued by Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company (MassMutual) (Springfield, MA 01111-0001) and its subsidiaries, C.M. Life Insurance Company and MML Bay State Life Insurance Company (Enfield, CT 06082).
Principal Underwriters: MML Distributors, LLC (MMLD) and MML Investors Services, LLC (MMLIS), Members SIPC® (www.SIPC.org), and MML Strategic Distributors, LLC (MSD). MMLD, MMLIS and MSD, all Members FINRA (www.FINRA.org), are subsidiaries of Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company, Springfield, MA 01111-0001.











Close











Variable Insurance Trust Funds - For Advisors - Nationwideskip to main contentFor IndividualsFor BusinessesContact Us














FOR FINANCIAL ADVISORS        


0 Alerts


0
Life transaction confirmations


0
Annuities transaction confirmations


0
Retirement plans 321


0
Retirement plans auto rebalancing


0
Retirement plans plan sponsor validation


0
Retirement plans report inbox


View all alerts


Advisor alerts



0


    Log In




Search toggle

    Log In





 powered by




Home Products Mutual Funds  Nationwide VIT Funds
Nationwide Variable Insurance Trust FundsWith a history in the industry spanning over 80 years, Nationwide has extensive experience helping advisors build wealth for clients with investment options in our variable annuity and variable life insurance products. We're a stable U.S. asset management company that employs a subadvised structure to offer you access to well-known money managers.Nationwide Variable Insurance Trust (NVIT) Funds are offered exclusively through Nationwide variable annuity and variable life insurance products.NVIT Funds are not sold to individual investors. They are sold only to separate accounts of insurance companies to fund benefits payable under variable annuity contracts and variable life insurance policies issued by life insurance companies."N/A" indicates that no fund document is available.* Regulatory documents include Summary Prospectus, Prospectus, SAI, Annual Report, Semiannual Report, and XBRL.
 Regulatory DocumentsSummary Prospectus, Prospectus, SAI, Annual Report, Semiannual ReportStatement of Investments (3/31)Statement of Investments (9/30)HoldingsAmerican Century NVIT Multi Cap Value FundView documentsViewViewViewAmerican Funds NVIT Asset Allocation FundView documentsViewViewViewAmerican Funds NVIT Bond FundView documentsViewViewViewAmerican Funds NVIT Global Growth FundView documentsViewViewViewAmerican Funds NVIT Growth FundView documentsViewViewViewAmerican Funds NVIT Growth-Income FundView documentsViewViewViewBlackRock NVIT Equity Dividend Fund1View documentsViewViewViewBlackRock NVIT Managed Global Allocation FundView documentsViewViewViewFederated NVIT High Income Bond FundView documentsViewViewViewNeuberger Berman NVIT Multi Cap Opportunities FundView documentsViewViewViewNeuberger Berman NVIT Socially Responsible FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Bond Index FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT CardinalSM Aggressive FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT CardinalSM Balanced FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT CardinalSM Capital Appreciation FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT CardinalSM Conservative FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT CardinalSM Managed Growth FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT CardinalSM Managed Growth & Income FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT CardinalSM Moderate FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT CardinalSM Moderately Aggressive FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT CardinalSM Moderately Conservative FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Core Bond FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Core Plus Bond FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT DFA Capital Appreciation Fund2View documentsViewViewViewNVIT DFA Moderate Fund3View documentsViewViewViewNVIT Emerging Markets FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Government Bond FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Government Money Market Fund4View documentsAdditional Money Market Fund DataViewViewViewNVIT International Equity FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT International Index FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Investor Destinations Aggressive FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Investor Destinations Balanced FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Investor Destinations Capital Appreciation FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Investor Destinations Conservative FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Investor Destinations Managed Growth FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Investor Destinations Managed Growth & Income FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Investor Destinations Moderate FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Investor Destinations Moderately Aggressive FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Investor Destinations Moderately Conservative FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Large Cap Growth FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Managed American Funds Asset Allocation FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Managed American Funds Growth-Income FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Mid Cap Index FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Multi Sector Bond FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Multi-Manager International Growth FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Multi-Manager International Value FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Multi-Manager Large Cap Growth FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Multi-Manager Large Cap Value FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Multi-Manager Mid Cap Growth FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Multi-Manager Mid Cap Value FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Multi-Manager Small Cap Growth FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Multi-Manager Small Cap Value FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Multi-Manager Small Company FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Nationwide FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Real Estate FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT S&P 500 Index FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Short Term Bond FundView documentsViewViewViewNVIT Small Cap Index FundView documentsViewViewViewTempleton NVIT International Value FundView documentsViewViewView1Change effective 1/10/2017; formerly known as Invesco NVIT Comstock Value Fund2Change effective 5/01/2017; formerly known as Loring Ward NVIT Capital Appreciation Fund3Change effective 5/01/2017; formerly known as Loring Ward NVIT Moderate Fund4Change effective 5/01/2017; formerly known as NVIT Money Market Fund
ADDITIONAL INFORMATIONNationwide VIT FundsDistributionsProspectuses & DocumentsVariable AnnuitiesLearn how Nationwide variable annuities may help meet your clients' retirement savings and income needs.Variable Universal Life InsuranceFind out how Nationwide variable universal life insurance products may help protect and secure your clients' financial future.Investment Outlook and CommentaryRead the latest economic and market commentary from Nationwide and our subadvisers.NFW-5385AO.5Home Products Mutual Funds  Nationwide VIT Funds


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Best life insurance plans and rates | LifePlans.com

































Compare the Top Online Life InsuranceCarriers in Michigan 














Coverage as Low as $15 a Month!











Rates in less than 2 Minutes. 100% Free,Safe, and Secure!








Life Insurance Helps the Ones You Love with:

Mortgage Payments
College Tuition
Outstanding Debt
Monthly Income




The Lowest Rates and Best Coverage

LifePlans.com is dedicated to helping you find the best life insurance policy, while saving you as much money as possible! How do we do that? Simply put, our technology and relationships are what enable us to pass the savings onto you.
Life insurance companies are constantly calculating and updating rates based on the changing demographics of the US population. LifePlans.com is connected to the databases of the leading carriers to help you find the best deal while using the most up-to-date rates.
What’s better is that our service is 100% free, and super-fast! All you have to do is:


1. Confirm your zip code.
2. Tell us about yourself and your coverage needs.
3. See your custom-results and start comparing multiple quotes.


As you are shopping around, there are certain questions that you should ask yourself. The best one to start with is: “How much coverage do I need?”  To give you an idea, most people opt for a Term Policy with about $250,000 in coverage. Why this amount or any amount for that matter? The answer is that it all depends on how much debt you would need to payoff and how much income you would need to replace in the event you are no longer around to provide for your loved ones.
Another good question to ask yourself, or one of the several qualified agents LifePlans.com can connect you with, is how long do want to be covered and whether an investment component in your policy is right for you. Unlike a term policy, which as its name suggests has rates and coverage based on a set term or number of years, a Permanent Policy does not expire. Typically, Whole Life, the most common type of permanent insurance, not only serves to pay-out your beneficiaries upon your passing, but also has a current cash value that can be borrowed against or cashed-out anytime. Essentially,               permanent policies are investments and can grow in value whereas term policies do not.  The catch is that they often have higher premiums. You can learn more about life insurance and policy types by clicking on the icons below.
So with flexible policy options plus the best rates and coverage, don’t wait any longer. Secure your coverage now with LifePlans.com and get back to living your life with those who matter most!




Learn More
Get more information about life insurance and the different types of policies:







Life Insurance Overview






Life Insurance Calculator






 Term Life Insurance 






Final Expense





Universal Life Insurance





Whole Life Insurance





About Us

LifePlans.com is a marketplace connecting people with insurance companies and the agents/brokers of insurance companies. LifePlans.com does not provide quotes or sell insurance directly to consumers, is not affiliated with any exchange, and is not a licensed insurance agent or broker. Accordingly, you should not send us (via mail or email) any sensitive information, including personal health information or applications. Any such communications will not be treated as confidential and will be discarded.
The information presented on LifePlans.com is intended for general consumer knowledge. We do not provide advice on individual situations or legal issues.



Get Started!















*Disclaimer: All quotes and rates are for illustration purposes. Actual premiums and coverage will be based on age, gender, health history, certain underwriting criteria, state of residence, and tobacco usage. Certain policies may require a medical exam. Not all policies or companies are available in all states. Advertised products are for US residents only.









LifePlans.com | 
				
				Contact Us
				
				 | Terms of Use
				 | Privacy Policy

Copyright © 2013 - 2017 LifePlans.com, all rights reserved.


LifePlans.com, 2381 Rosecrans Ave, Suite 400,El Segundo, CA 90245 | info@LifePlans.com



 

    








 












Privacy Policy 
Privacy Policy
Effective Date: February 1, 2016

Our Practices Regarding Privacy
Healthplans.com LLC, through its LifePlans.com website (“Site”) is committed to ensuring the privacy and security of each user that visits our website. Your privacy rights are important to us and we are committed to respecting your online privacy and making sure that any information you share with us by using our website is properly protected.
We have established this LifePlans.com Privacy Policy so you know the importance we place on your privacy and so you can understand how we collect and use information collected from you when you visit our website or submit any personally identifiable information to us. This policy describes our overall privacy practices regarding information we collect on our web sites and through other Internet mediums. Our policy does not apply to the practices of companies that we do not own or control.
Data We Collect
When you visit our website, we collect personally identifiable information (“PII”) and non-personally identifiable information through various sources.  PII means any information that may be used to identify an individual, including but not limited to name, address, and telephone number.  Non-PII is data that is not used to specifically identify, contact or locate an individual, including but not limited to zip code, gender, and age.
When you use the Site, we automatically collect certain information from you, such as your browser type (e.g., Internet Explorer, Safari, Chrome); your Internet domain, (e.g., Comcast, Time Warner, etc.); your computer’s operating system, (e.g., Windows, Macintosh, UNIX, Linux); referring and exit page; operating system; the type of mobile device you use (if applicable); your mobile device’s unique device ID; and your IP address.  This information lets us see how users find our Site, and it tells us which pages users visit most frequently so we can make our Site more useful. We keep this information for an indefinite amount of time to improve the operation of our Site and to provide better services to our users.
In addition to the data that your browser or Internet session sends us automatically, we may also collect PII if you enter it when using our website. This contact information is stored on our servers and used to fulfill your information request. If you have not opted out of its use, we may share it with our data licensees, including our advertising clients and their vendors, and other advertising partners.
How We Use and Share Your Information
We may use the information we collect from and about you for the following purposes:  (1) to fulfill your requests for information; (2) to respond to your inquiries; (3) to review Site usage and operations; (4) to address problems with the Site, our business, or our services; (5) to protect the security or integrity of the Site and our business; (6) to monitor the Site for compliance with our Terms of Use and the law; (7) to help improve our Site or services; and (8) to contact you with Site updates, newsletters and other informational and promotional materials from us and third party marketing offers from our trusted partners, as well as from other companies.
We may disclose information collected from and about you as follows: (1) to our related companies and service providers, to perform a business, professional or technical support function for us; (2) to our marketing partners, advertisers or other third parties, who may contact you with their own offers; (3) as necessary if we believe that there has been a violation of our Terms of Use or of our rights or the rights of any third party; (4) to respond to legal process (such as a search warrant, subpoena or court order) and provide information to law enforcement agencies or in connection with an investigation on matters related to public safety, as permitted by law, or otherwise as required by law; and (5) in the event that our company or substantially all of its assets are acquired, your personal information may be one of the transferred assets. We may also disclose your personal information with your express consent. We may share aggregate, non-personally identifiable information about Site users with third parties.
Third Parties Contacting You
Different advertisers and advertising companies have different methods of following up with you on information requests. Some send brochures in the mail, others reply via email or some may contact you by telephone. By using our service to request information from our advertising clients and advertising partners, you are giving permission to Healthplans.com LLC and these parties (or their partners and vendors) to contact you using the methods of their choice, even if the phone number you provide is in a corporate, state, or national do not call list, now or in the future (unless and until you opt-out from receiving communications from us or such partners, as applicable).  You are also providing your express consent to be called or texted (including prerecorded messages or using an autodialer or automated means) at the number you provide.
Cookies
Our websites use cookies (small files containing program code that reside on your computer), to provide usage statistics about our web site, and to understand where visitors learn about our web site. We also may use cookies to simplify the re-entering of your data. You can adjust your browser settings to opt out of the use of cookies by having your browser disable cookies. Look for the cookie options in your browser in the Options or Preferences menu.
Additionally, we use cookies, web beacons, and other technologies to receive and store certain types of information whenever you interact with us through your computer or mobile device on the Site. This information, which may include the pages you visit on our or our partners’ sites, which web address you came from, the type of browser/device/hardware you are using, or an IP-based geographic location, helps us recognize you, customize your website experience and make marketing messages more relevant. These companies use non-personally identifiable information (e.g., click stream information, browser type, time and date, hardware/software information) during your visits to this and other websites in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of greater interest to you. At this time, we do not respond to browser “do not track” signals. However, we may provide you with ways to choose not to have your information collected or used in this way. To learn more about targeted ads or to opt-out of this type of advertising, visit the Network Advertising Initiative website or Digital Advertising Alliance website.
Opt-Out of Receiving Communications from LifePlans.com
You may opt out by contacting us by submitting a “Stop contacting me” request on our Contact Us page; calling us at (310) 219-6202; or sending a letter to: Healthplans.com LLC, 2381 Rosecrans Ave., Suite 400, El Segundo, CA 90245.
Children’s Privacy
We do not direct the Site to, nor do we knowingly collect any PII from, any individuals less than thirteen years of age. If you are the parent or guardian and are made aware that a child under the age of 13 has provided us with PII, please contact us.
Third Party Links
This Site may contain links that direct you to websites owned and operated by other companies. LifePlans.com does not control or endorse these websites, and we do not assume any responsibility for the content, privacy policies or practices of any third party websites, which may use cookies and collect PII from you.  We recommend that you review the privacy policy posted on any external website before disclosing any PII.  Please contact those websites directly if you have any questions about their privacy policies.
California Privacy Rights
Under California’s “Shine the Light” law, we provide a method for consumers to “opt-out” of having their information shared with third-parties. Contact us using the methods described in the “Contact Us” section to unsubscribe.
Privacy Policy Changes
LifePlans.com may change this Privacy Policy at any time. Should we revise this Privacy Policy in the future, we will immediately publish the amended Privacy Policy on our website. We recommend that you check our website frequently to view recent changes or updates.
Contact Us
We invite you to contact us if you have questions or comments about our Privacy Policy or you want to change the personally identifiable information you have provided to us. You may contact us by:
Sending a letter to: Healthplans.com LLC, 2381 Rosecrans Ave., Suite 400, El Segundo, CA 90245
Calling us at (310) 219-6202
Emailing us at: legal@healthplans.com
If we need, or are required to, contact you regarding your personal information, we may do so by telephone, email, or mail.


Terms Of Use 
Terms of Use
Effective Date: February 9, 2017
Please read these terms and conditions of use before using this site.
The LifePlans.com website (“LifePlans.com” or the “Site”) is owned and operated by Healthplans.com LLC (“Healthplans.com”). By using this Site, you signify your assent to these Terms of Use (“Terms” or “Agreement”). If you do not agree to all of these Terms, do not use this site.
BY ACCESSING OR USING ANY PART OF THE SITE, YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE READ, UNDERSTAND AND AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THIS AGREEMENT. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO BE SO BOUND, DO NOT ACCESS OR USE THE SITE. PLEASE READ THESE TERMS CAREFULLY. THEY CONTAIN A MANDATORY ARBITRATION PROVISION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER.
Use of the Website
By using the Site, you represent to LifePlans.com that 1) you are authorized to enter into this Agreement and you are at least the age of majority in your state or province of residence; (2) you will not use the Site for any purpose or in any manner that violates any law or regulation or that infringes the rights of Healthplans.com or any third party; (3) any information or data provided to Healthplans.com by you will not violate any law or regulation or infringe the rights of Healthplans.com or any third party; (4) all information that you provide to us in connection with the Site (e.g., name, e-mail address, and other information) is true and accurate; and (5) you are authorized and able to fulfill and perform the obligations and meet the conditions of a user as specified herein. This Agreement provides to you a personal, revocable, limited, non-exclusive, royalty-free, non-sublicenseable, non-transferable license to use the Site conditioned on your continued compliance with the Terms of this Agreement. You may print and download materials and information from the Site solely for your personal use, provided that all hard copies contain all copyright and other applicable notices contained in such materials and information. Notwithstanding the foregoing, you may not modify, translate, decompile, create derivative work(s) of, copy, distribute, disassemble, broadcast, transmit, publish, remove or alter any proprietary notices or labels, license, sublicense, transfer, sell, mirror, frame, exploit, rent, lease, private label, grant a security interest in, or otherwise use the Website in any manner not expressly permitted herein. Specifically, and by way of illustration and not limitation, you may not (a) separate and use any graphics, photographs, or other audio, visual, or video elements from the accompanying text or material without the prior express written permission of Healthplans.com and/or its licensor(s); (b) use any “deep link,” “page scrape,” “robot,” “spider,” or other device, program, script, algorithm, or methodology to access, acquire, copy, or monitor any portion of the Site or in any way reproduce or circumvent the navigational structure of the Site to obtain or attempt to obtain any materials, documents, or information through any means not purposely made available through the Site; (c) probe, scan, or test the vulnerability of the Site or any network connected to the Site; (d) use any device, software, or routine to interfere with the proper working of the Site or any transaction conducted on the Site; (e) forge headers, impersonate a person, or otherwise manipulate identifiers in order to disguise your identity or the origin of any message or transmittal you send to Healthplans.com on or through the Site; (f) use the Site to harvest or collect e-mail addresses or other contact information; or (g) use the Site in a manner that could damage, disparage, or otherwise negatively impact Healthplans.com. The licenses granted by Healthplans.com terminate if you do not comply with these Terms.
The material, images, and text on the Site (“Content”) is protected by copyright under both United States and foreign laws. Title to the Content remains with LifePlans.com or its licensors. Any use of the Content not expressly permitted by these Terms and Conditions is a breach of this Agreement and may violate copyright, trademark, and other laws. Content and features are subject to change or termination without notice in the editorial discretion of LifePlans.com. All rights not expressly granted herein are reserved to LifePlans.com and its licensors. If you violate any of these Terms, your permission to use the Content automatically terminates and you must immediately destroy any copies you have made of any portion of the Content.
Privacy
Please review our Privacy Policy to understand our practices regarding personal information provided by you, which is incorporated herein by reference.
Limitation of Liability and Disclaimer of Warranties
The use of the Site and the Content is at your own risk. When using the Site, information will be transmitted over a medium that may be beyond the control and jurisdiction of LifePlans.com and its suppliers. Accordingly, LifePlans.com assumes no liability for or relating to the delay, failure, interruption, or corruption of any data or other information transmitted in connection with use of the Site. The Site and the content are provided on an “as is” and “as available” basis and may include errors, omissions, or other inaccuracies. MOREOVER, Healthplans.com MAY MAKE MODIFICATIONS ANY/OR CHANGES ON THIS SITE OR IN THE MATERIALS AND INFORMATION AVAILABLE ON THIS SITE AT ANY TIME AND FOR ANY REASON. Healthplans.com MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS, GUARANTEES, OR WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, AS TO THE SUITABILITY, COMPLETENESS, TIMELINESS, RELIABILITY, LEGALITY, OR ACCURACY OF THE Healthplans.com SERVICES OR THE INFORMATION, CONTENT, MATERIALS, PRODUCTS, OR OTHER SERVICES, OR INCLUDED ON OR OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE ON THE SITE. YOU EXPRESSLY AGREE THAT YOUR USE OF THE SITE IS AT YOUR OWN RISK. TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMISSIBLE BY APPLICABLE LAW, Healthplans.com DISCLAIMS ALL WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND FITNESS FOR PARTICULAR PURPOSE. Healthplans.com DOES NOT WARRANT THAT THE INFORMATION, CONTENT, MATERIALS, PRODUCTS OR OTHER SERVICES INCLUDED ON OR OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE TO YOU THROUGH THE SITE, Healthplans.com’S SERVERS, OR ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS SENT FROM Healthplans.com ARE FREE OF VIRUSES OR OTHER HARMFUL COMPONENTS. Healthplans.com ALSO MAKES NO REPRESENTATION, GUARANTEE, OR WARRANTY THAT THIS WEBSITE WILL OPERATE ERROR FREE OR IN AN UNINTERRUPTED FASHION.
To the maximum extent permitted by law, in no event shall LifePlans.com, its licensors, its suppliers, or any third parties mentioned on the Site be liable for any damages (including, without limitation, indirect, punitive, special, incidental, or consequential damages, personal injury/wrongful death, lost profits, or damages resulting from lost data or business interruption) resulting from the use of or inability to use the Site or the Content, the delay or inability to use the Site, or from any information, Content, materials, or Healthplans.com services included on or otherwise made available to you through the Site, whether based in contract, tort, strict liability, or otherwise, and whether or not Healthplans.com, its licensors, its suppliers, or any third parties mentioned on the Site have been advised of the possibility of such damages. Healthplans.com, its licensors, its suppliers, or any third parties mentioned on the Site shall be liable only to the extent of actual damages incurred by you, not to exceed U.S. $100. Any claims arising in connection with your use of the Site or any Content must be brought within one (1) year of the date of the event giving rise to such action occurred. NOTWITHSTANDING ANYTHING IN THESE TERMS TO THE CONTRARY, THIS DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES AND LIMITATION OF LIABILITY DO NOT APPLY IN NEW JERSEY.
User Submissions
You agree that you will not upload or transmit any communications or content of any type to the Site that infringe or violate any rights of any party. By submitting communications or content to the Site, you agree that such submission is non-confidential for all purposes. If you make any submission to the Site or if you submit any business information, idea, concept or invention to LifePlans.com by email, you automatically grant-or warrant that the owner of such content or intellectual property has expressly granted Healthplans.com a royalty-free, perpetual, irrevocable, sublicensable world-wide nonexclusive license to use, reproduce, create derivative works from, modify, publish, edit, translate, distribute, perform, and display the communication or content in any media or medium, or any form, format, or forum now known or hereafter developed. If you wish to keep any business information, ideas, concepts or inventions private or proprietary, do not submit them to the Site or to LifePlans.com by email.
Advertisements, Searches, and Links to Other Sites
LifePlans.com may provide links to third-party websites. LifePlans.com also may select certain websites as priority responses to search terms you enter and LifePlans.com may agree to allow advertisers to respond to certain search terms with advertisements or sponsored content. LifePlans.com does not endorse the content on any third-party websites. LifePlans.com is not responsible for the content of linked third-party sites, sites framed within the Site, third-party websites provided as search results, or third-party advertisements, and does not make any representations regarding their content or accuracy. Your use of third-party websites is at your own risk and subject to the terms and conditions of use and privacy policies for such websites.
Electronic Communications
When you use the Site, or send e-mails to us, you are communicating with us electronically. You consent to receive communications from us electronically. We will communicate with you by e-mail or by posting notices on or through the Site. You agree that all agreements, notices, disclosures and other communications that we provide to you electronically satisfy any legal requirement that such communications be in writing.
Governing Law
These Terms are governed by the laws of the State of California, without respect to its conflict of laws principles.
Arbitration
All disputes arising out of or relating to any purchase you make with via this Site, any information you provide via the Site, these Terms (including the formation, performance or alleged breach), and your use of the Site will be exclusively resolved under confidential binding arbitration in accordance with the Rules of the American Arbitration Association (“AAA”), including the AAA’s Supplementary Procedures for Consumer-Related Disputes (collectively, the “AAA Rules”) then in effect at the time of the dispute. The AAA Rules are available at www.adr.org or by calling 1-800-778-7879. If you initiate arbitration, Healthplans.com will promptly reimburse you for any standard filing fee which may have been required under AAA Rules once you have notified Healthplans.com in writing and provided a copy of the arbitration proceedings. However, if Healthplans.com is the prevailing party in the arbitration, applicable law may allow the arbitrator to award attorneys’ fees and costs to Healthplans.com. If for any reason the AAA is unavailable, the parties shall mutually select another arbitration forum. The arbitration will be conducted in the city of Los Angeles, California, but may proceed telephonically if the claimant so chooses.
The arbitrator’s award will be binding and may be entered as a judgment in any court of competent jurisdiction. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, no arbitration under these Terms may be joined to an arbitration involving any other party subject to these Terms, whether through class arbitration proceedings or otherwise. Notwithstanding the foregoing, we will have the right to seek injunctive or other equitable relief in state or federal court located to enforce these Terms or prevent an infringement of a third party’s rights. In the event equitable relief is sought, each party hereby irrevocably submits to the personal jurisdiction of such court.
Waiver of Class Action Rights
ANY DISPUTES ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO YOUR USE OF THIS SITE, ANY INFORMATION YOU PROVIDE VIA THE SITE, THESE TERMS (INCLUDING THEIR FORMATION, PERFORMANCE OR ALLEGED BREACH), AND YOUR USE OF THE SITE SHALL BE SUBMITTED INDIVIDUALLY BY YOU, AND SHALL NOT BE SUBJECT TO ANY CLASS ACTION OR REPRESENTATIVE STATUS. BY ENTERING INTO THIS AGREEMENT, YOU HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVE ANY RIGHT YOU MAY HAVE TO JOIN CLAIMS WITH THOSE OF OTHERS or participate as a member of a class of claimants with respect to any claim submitted to arbitration. The parties to this arbitration agreement acknowledge that this class action waiver is material and essential to the arbitration of any disputes between the parties and is nonseverable from the agreement to arbitrate claims. If any portion of this class action waiver is limited, voided, or cannot be enforced, then the parties’ agreement to arbitrate shall be null and void. YOU UNDERSTAND THAT BY AGREEING TO THIS CLASS ACTION WAIVER, YOU MAY ONLY BRING CLAIMS AGAINST Healthplans.com IN AN INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY AND NOT AS A PLAINTIFF OR CLASS MEMBER IN ANY PURPORTED CLASS ACTION OR REPRESENTATIVE PROCEEDING.
YOU UNDERSTAND THAT YOU WOULD HAVE HAD A RIGHT TO LITIGATE THROUGH A COURT, TO HAVE A JUDGE OR JURY DECIDE YOUR CASE AND TO BE PARTY TO A CLASS OR REPRESENTATIVE ACTION. HOWEVER, YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE TO HAVE ANY CLAIMS DECIDED INDIVIDUALLY AND ONLY THROUGH ARBITRATION.
You shall have thirty (30) days from the date that you submit your personally identifiable information to opt-out of this arbitration agreement. To opt out of arbitration you must email us at legal@healthplans.com. If more than thirty (30) days have passed, you are not eligible to opt out of arbitration.
Notice and Take Down Procedures; Copyright Agent
If you believe any materials accessible on or from the Site infringe your copyright, you may request removal of those materials (or access thereto) from this web site by contacting LifePlans.com’s copyright agent (identified below) and providing the following information:
Identification of the copyrighted work that you believe to be infringed. Please describe the work, and where possible include a copy or the location (e.g., URL) of an authorized version of the work.
A description, in reasonable detail (including the applicable URL) of the material that you believe to be infringing and its location. Please provide us with enough information that will allow us to locate the material.
Your name, address, telephone number and (if available) e-mail address.
A statement that you have a good faith belief that the complained-of use of the materials is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent, or the law.
A statement by you, made under the penalty of perjury, that the information that you have supplied is accurate, and indicating that you are the copyright owner or are authorized to act on the copyright owner’s behalf.
A signature or the electronic equivalent from the copyright holder or authorized representative.
Please send this notice to:
Attn: LifePlans.com Legal
2381 Rosecrans Ave., Suite 400
El Segundo, California 90245
Email: legal@healthplans.com
Complete Agreement
Except as expressly provided in a particular “legal notice” on the Site or via e-mail from Healthplans.com LLC or LifePlans.com, this Agreement and the LifePlans.com Privacy Policy constitute the entire agreement between you and LifePlans.com with respect to the use of the Site and Content.
If any provision of this Agreement is found to be invalid by any court having competent jurisdiction, the invalidity of such provision shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions of this Agreement, which shall remain in full force and effect. No waiver of any of these Terms shall be deemed a further or continuing waiver of such term or condition or any other term or condition.
Contact Us
Thank you for your cooperation. We hope you find the Site helpful and convenient to use! Questions or comments regarding this website, including any reports of non-functioning links, should be submitted through our Contact Us page.

© 2017 LifePlans.com All rights reserved



    //www.lifeplans.com/ lifeplans.com LifePlans.com 2017




mutualsfundsguidance.com














Putnam Investments - Mutual funds, Institutional, and 529


































About Putnam

Our company
Executive team
Board of Trustees
Proxy voting
Newsroom
Careers
Our culture
Organization
Early career programs
Benefits
Open positions



Contact us
























The Fed may be ahead of the curve


Q3 2017 | Capital Markets Outlook
As the market digests the Fed's latest rate increase, a long-anticipated surge in inflation remains elusive.
Find out why »






You may also be interested in:

Q3 2017 | Equity Outlook
For U.S. equity investors, the second quarter offered a number of familiar themes: relatively low volatility, new record highs for major indexes, and a modest advance for stocks.
Find out why  »


Q3 2017 | Fixed Income Outlook
In the United States, we see an increasing amount of evidence pointing toward late-cycle economic conditions.
Find out why  »












View all Putnam funds »




Income funds for a changing rate outlook
+
–



Putnam Short Duration Income Fund
Putnam Absolute Return 100 Fund
Putnam Absolute Return 300 Fund
Putnam Diversified Income Trust







Equity funds that can gain from growth
+
–



Putnam Equity Income Fund
Putnam Growth Opportunities Fund







Tax-exempt income funds
+
–



Putnam Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam Tax-Free High Yield Fund







Funds with risk-reducing diversification
+
–



Putnam Absolute Return 500 Fund
Putnam Dynamic Asset Allocation Balanced Fund
Putnam Dynamic Asset Allocation Growth Fund












IDEAS FOR WEALTH MANAGEMENT







Don’t lose sight of discretionary spending in retirement plan















Advisor-only Webcast
|
Distinctly different: How to brand yourself in a world of sameness
|
July 19, 2017
|
1:15pm ET






Listen to replay











60-second Insights


See all videos »








Learn how interest-rate risk dominates indexes


Explore an unconstrained bond portfolio


See how unconstrained funds outperformed during rising rate periods


Fixed Income Outlook Q3 2017









Look for secular trends that can sustain earnings


Explore a growth portfolio with a thematic approach


Equity Outlook Q3 2017









Software as a service can change a business


Explore a global technology portfolio


Equity Outlook Q3 2017










Financial advisors:

Explore fund ideas, analyze portfolios, and create presentations with this free, open architecture tool.
Download the app or use now:



On your iPad

App Store




Launch FundVisualizer

Login required













Our commitment to performance excellence
Putnam Investments is proud to partner with world-class athletes, teams, and organizations who share our:

Belief in teamwork
Dedication to winning
Focus on performance




















New England Patriots


Boston Celtics


Ted Ligety & U.S. Ski and snowboard assoc.


Keegan Bradley  Brendan Steele  Jon Curran












 



Mutual Funds
















 























×
LinkedIn allows you to select who can see your connections.


Learn more
By making your connections visible:

Your connections can see your network and ask for introductions
You can ask your connections for introductions
You can fully participate in the LinkedIn social ecosystem and continually build your network

Decide who you want to connect with on LinkedIn:

Your shared connections are always visible, no matter what setting you choose
Consider removing some connections if you don't want them to see your network.










Putnam Investments - Financial Advisor




Login
Register
About Putnam
Contact us









 






Mutual funds



Absolute Return
Asset Allocation
Global Sector
Growth




Blend
Taxable Income
Tax-free Income
Value




Pricing and performance
Pricing policies
Historical pricing
Prospectuses/fund documents




See all mutual funds


Other investments

Closed-end funds
Annuities
Non-U.S. funds



FundVisualizer
 
Select a Putnam fund to compare
Putnam Growth Opportunities Fund
Putnam Pennsylvania Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam Global Sector Fund
Putnam Multi-Cap Core Fund
Putnam Capital Spectrum Fund
Putnam Global Equity Fund
Putnam Equity Spectrum Fund
Putnam George Putnam Balanced Fund
Putnam Global Income Trust
Putnam Global Health Care Fund
Putnam Short Duration Income Fund
Putnam Dynamic Risk Allocation Fund
Putnam High Yield Fund
Putnam Floating Rate Income Fund
Putnam Multi-Cap Growth Fund
Putnam New Jersey Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2060 Fund
Putnam Absolute Return 700 Fund
Putnam Government Money Market Fund (A Shares)
Putnam Absolute Return 500 Fund
Putnam Equity Income Fund
Putnam Europe Equity Fund
Putnam American Government Income Fund
Putnam Dynamic Asset Allocation Conservative Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2055 Fund
Putnam Dynamic Asset Allocation Balanced Fund
Putnam New York Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam Dynamic Asset Allocation Growth Fund
Putnam Retirement Income Fund Lifestyle 1
Putnam Ohio Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam International Equity Fund
Putnam Small Cap Value Fund
Putnam Massachusetts Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam Diversified Income Trust
Putnam Convertible Securities Fund
Putnam California Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam Global Financials Fund
Putnam Small Cap Growth Fund
Putnam Global Consumer Fund
Putnam International Capital Opportunities Fund
Putnam International Value Fund
Putnam Global Telecommunications Fund
Putnam Global Natural Resources Fund
Putnam Money Market Fund (A Shares)
Putnam Global Technology Fund
Putnam Global Industrials Fund
Putnam Capital Opportunities Fund
Putnam Tax-Free High Yield Fund
Putnam Global Utilities Fund
Putnam U.S. Government Income Trust
Putnam Research Fund
Putnam Minnesota Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam AMT-Free Municipal Fund
Putnam Absolute Return 300 Fund
Putnam Absolute Return 100 Fund
Putnam Short-Term Municipal Income Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2030 Fund
Putnam International Growth Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2045 Fund
Putnam Intermediate-Term Municipal Income Fund
Putnam Tax Exempt Income Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2050 Fund
Putnam Income Fund
Putnam Multi-Cap Value Fund
Putnam Low Volatility Equity Fund
Putnam Emerging Markets Income Fund
Putnam Emerging Markets Equity Fund
Putnam Investors Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2020 Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2025 Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2035 Fund
Putnam RetirementReady 2040 Fund


Tax Center

Year-end distributions
Help with tax forms
Fund tax data





Our fundamental approach
Only an active approach can offer more than the market. Our portfolio managers invest with conviction based on fundamental research and a proactive view of risk.

All managers


Insights on investing

Revisiting "Thinking outside the index" (PDF)
Independent equity research: How we do it, and why it matters (PDF)



Manager spotlight


D. William Kohli
Chief Investment Officer, Fixed Income discusses how his background in quantitative analysis contributes to his approach to investing in dynamic markets.
Watch video »











Latest perspective


Value benefits from an expanding economy
Value stocks have lagged the market in 2017, but if the economy continues to expand, rates rise, and the yield curve steepens, this trend could reverse.






See all Perspectives posts


Market updates

60-second Insights
Weekly economic update
Webcasts and conference calls
Market Perspectives



Outlooks and research

Capital Markets Outlook
Fixed Income Outlook
Equity Outlook
Investment insights
Infographics





Help clients maneuver in markets.





More resources:

Putnam fund managers discuss the current investment environment.
Navigate changing rates by going beyond the indexes
Invest for tax-exempt income
Diversifying with asset allocation
Diversifying with absolute return






More ideas for your clients

Saving for college
Saving for retirement
Diversifying with income funds
Diversifying with global allocation
Diversifying with absolute return





FundVisualizer®



View over 30,000 funds, ETFs, and indexes
Build and compare portfolios
Import fund data
Create presentations
Free for advisors









Launch FundVisualizer | View a demo from our webcast replay




Tools and calculators

Order literature
CD vs. municipal bond calculator
Hypothetical expense calculator


See all tools


Frequently requested forms

Mutual Fund Account Application (PDF)
Designation of Beneficiary (PDF)
IRA forms and applications


See all forms




Ideas for wealth management


Don’t lose sight of discretionary spending in retirement plan
Planning for both discretionary spending as well as essential expenses is important when saving for retirement.






See all Wealth Management posts


Resources for you

Social media survey
Social media training
Advisor Tech Tips
Practice management
Continuing education
Portfolio Solutions



Resources for your clients

Order literature
Investor education
Client seminars





Over 75 years serving investors through advisors


To navigate complex financial markets, investors deserve an ally. Study after study confirms that investors benefit from working with financial advisors who can help develop and maintain a long-term strategy.



About our commitment to you



Standards of excellence
Supporting your efforts




Content for you and your clients
Your Putnam team
Backed by Great-West Lifeco







Why log in?
Login to access and manage your client information through Putnam's Daily Statement view or DST Vision.


Help logging in
For login assistance, please call support services at
 1-800-354-2228


Log in for account access via DST Vision



User ID





Password







 Remember me




Login




To create or reset a DST Vision ID, call: 1-800-354-2228. Non-U.S. advisors, call: +1 617-292-1000 x43051. (M-F, 8:30 a.m. - 7:00 p.m. ET)








 


Home
Mutual funds





Putnam Mutual Funds
Managed strategies for pursuing investors' goals
At Putnam, both traditional and alternative strategies are inspired by our independent approach to investment research. We look for value beyond mainstream benchmark indexes, pursue new drivers of return, and take a broader view of market risk with the goal of reducing volatility.
Explore our products to build a diversified portfolio.




Compare Putnam funds with industry peers on FundVisualizer®, then share insights with your clients.


 

All funds
Trending
FundVisualizer comparison
Fund commentary







Fund search:









|Filter



Clear all
Close



Absolute Return
Asset Allocation
Blend
Global Sector
Growth
Taxable Income
Tax-free Income
Value

Morningstar Ratings (5-year)









Above-Lipper Median



Annualized Returns (before sales charge)
between



%


and



%



Time period


10 yrs./Life
5 yrs.
3 yrs.
1 yr.




Portfolio Managers

All Portfolio Managers
Aaron M. Cooper, CFA 
Adrian H. Chan, CFA 
Albert Chan, CFA 
Andrew J. Yoon CFA
Anthony J. Daigle 
Brett S. Kozlowski, CFA 
Christopher J. Eitzmann 
D. William Kohli 
Daniel J. Graña, CFA 
Daniel Schiff 
Darren A. Jaroch, CFA 
David L. Diamond, CFA 
David L. Glancy 
Di Yao 
Elizabeth Hansen McGuire 
Emily E. Shanks 
Eric N. Harthun, CFA 
Garrett L. Hamilton, CFA 
Gerard P. Sullivan 
Isabel Buccellati 
Jacquelyne J. Cavanaugh 
James A. Fetch 
James A. Polk, CFA 
Jason R. Vaillancourt, CFA 
Jatin Misra PhD, CFA
Jeffrey B. Sacknowitz, CFA 
Joanne M. Driscoll, CFA 
Jonathan M. Topper 
Joshua H. Fillman 
Karan S. Sodhi, CFA 
Kathryn B. Lakin 
Michael J. Atkin 
Michael J. Lima, CFA 
Michael J. Maguire, CFA 
Michael V. Salm 
Neil P. Desai 
Norman P. Boucher 
Paul D. Scanlon, CFA 
Paul M. Drury, CFA 
Robert J. Kea, CFA 
Robert J. Schoen 
Robert L. Davis, CFA 
Robert L. Salvin 
Robert M. Brookby 
Ryan W. Kauppila 
Samuel Cox 
Shep Perkins, CFA 
Simon Davis 
Spencer Morgan, CFA 
Vivek Gandhi, CFA 
Walter D. Scully, CPA 
William C. Rives 
William J. Monroe, CFA 



Viewing:  




Share Class



Select
A
B
C
M
R
R5
R6
T1
Y




Y share annualized returns as of 06/30/17
Cumulative Returns as of 06/30/17
Volatility & Risk (A and Y shares only)
Profile
Morningstar Ratings
Lipper Rankings
Up-market Capture Ratio (A and Y shares only)
Down-market Capture Ratio (A and Y shares only)
Information Ratio (A and Y shares only)


Before sales charge
After sales charge




Please note: B Shares are closed to new investors



 
Fund 
Ticker 
Asset class 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
Beta 
R2 
Std. Dev. 
Sharpe Ratio 
Alpha 
Expense Ratio 
Total Assets ($m) 
Turnover Ratio 
Overall 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 

Compare

Track









10 most-viewed funds:

-1 year ago



-9 months ago



-6 months ago



-3 months ago


Now






1
2




3
4


5
6


7


8
9


10










† The benchmark shown is a "best fit" benchmark assigned by Morningstar. Morningstar does not calculate benchmark performance for funds with a blended, or combined primary benchmark. For more information on the Fund's benchmark, please click on the prospectus link above. 
Powered by Morningstar.
Morningstar data is shown as of the most recent reporting period by each fund family. Allocations may not equal 100% and will vary overtime. Assets contained within "Other" category are not classified by Morningstar. All information presented in this tool is for informational purposes only and is not intended to be investment advice. The information is not meant to be an offer to sell or a recommendation to buy any investment product. Unless otherwise noted, performance is shown before sales charge. For more fund information, click the prospectuses button.
All information is historical and not indicative of future results. Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. After-sales-charge returns reflect the maximum sales charge applicable to the fund, which can be found within the Table Chart. Performance may not reflect any expense limitation or subsidies currently in effect. Short-term trading fees may apply. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit Morningstar.com.
This material is for informational and educational purposes only. It is not a recommendation of any specific investment product, strategy, or decision, and is not intended to suggest taking or refraining from any course of action. It is not intended to address the needs, circumstances, and objectives of any specific investor. Putnam, which earns fees when clients select its products and services, is not offering impartial advice in a fiduciary capacity in providing this sales and marketing material. This information is not meant as tax or legal advice. Investors should consult a professional advisor before making investment and financial decisions and for more information on tax rules and other laws, which are complex and subject to change.
Not FDIC insured | May lose value | No bank guarantee








‡ As of May 8, 2017, Putnam High Yield Advantage Fund was renamed to Putnam High Yield Fund.


Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com. 



Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Returns before sales charge do not reflect the current maximum sales charges as indicated below. Had the sales charge been reflected, returns would be lower. Returns at public offering price (after sales charge) for class A and class M shares reflect the current maximum initial sales charges of 5.75% and 3.50% for equity funds and Putnam Absolute Return 500 Fund and 700 Fund, and 4.00% and 3.25% for income funds (1.00% and 0.75% for Putnam Floating Rate Income Fund and Putnam Absolute Return 100 Fund and 300 Fund), respectively. Class B share returns reflect the applicable contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC), which is 5% in the first year, declining to 1% in the sixth year, and is eliminated thereafter (except for Putnam Floating Rate Income Fund, which is 3% in the first year, declining to 1% in the fourth year, and is eliminated thereafter). Class C shares reflect a 1% CDSC the first year that is eliminated thereafter. Performance for class B, C, M, R, T, and Y shares prior to their inception is derived from the historical performance of class A shares, adjusted for the applicable sales charge (or CDSC) and, except for class Y shares, the higher operating expenses for such shares (with the exception of Putnam Tax-Free High Yield Fund and Putnam AMT-Free Municipal Fund, which are based on the historical performance of class B shares). Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. Class A, M, and T shares of Putnam money market funds have no initial sales charge. For a portion of the periods, some funds had expenses limitations or had been sold on a limited basis with limited assets and expenses, without which returns would be lower. 



Lipper rankings are based on total return without sales charge relative to all share classes of funds with similar objectives as determined by Lipper. Past performance is not indicative of future results. Rankings for other periods can be found on the Facts & Rankings tab.



For each fund with at least a three-year history, Morningstar calculates a Morningstar Rating based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a fund's monthly performance (including the effects of sales charges, loads, and redemption fees), placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of funds in each category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. (Each share class is counted as a fraction of one fund within this scale and rated separately, which may cause slight variations in the distribution percentages.) The Overall Morningstar Rating for a fund is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its 3–, 5–, and 10–year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. Data is historical. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Rankings for other periods can be found on the Facts & Rankings tab.



























Research Fund Performance with FundVisualizer - Putnam Investments



































Download FundVisualizer®

On your iPad

App Store






Winner - Appy Awards 2017









Menu






FundVisualizer is an advisor-only tool that streamlines your fund research with intuitive controls and powerful features.




Analyze funds from across the industry
Assess the impact that correlation can have on your portfolio
Easily import your fund data
Share with clients




Explore new investment opportunities
Create and model custom hypotheticals
Model portfolio performance
Build out your library of custom charts




LAUNCH TOOL
DOWNLOAD











 
Your browser does not support the video tag.



















Analyze funds from across the industry
Evaluate more than 30,000 funds, ETFs, and indexes, using over 80 performance and risk metrics, and compare funds and portfolios directly from your desktop or tablet.

Make head-to-head comparisons of funds or create and model portfolios
Access from any modern web browser or from your iPad











Explore new investment opportunities
Use the all-new fund explorer feature and find similar funds based on the same share class and Morningstar category.

Filter your results to find potential new opportunities for your clients
Easily add any fund from the results page to a new comparison











Compare correlation to uncover hidden portfolio risk
Diversifying by market cap, geography, or investment style may not be enough.
The traditional model for building a diversified portfolio may not be adequate in today's market. Adding small-cap stocks to a large-cap portfolio, combining growth stocks with value stocks, or even supplementing a U.S.-focused fund mix with international or emerging-market equities may not create the level of diversification desired. The reason: high correlations across markets and investment styles over the past several years.
Use FundVisualizer to compare the correlation between two portfolios and fund-to-fund correlation to uncover hidden portfolio risk.










Create and model custom hypotheticals
Use the compare feature to create two portfolios and then model accumulation or withdrawal outcomes by entering custom dollar amounts for periodic contributions or withdrawals.










Easily import your fund data
Copy and paste, drag and drop, or browse and upload all your fund tickers and portfolio allocations from a spreadsheet to save for easy comparisons later.










Model portfolio performance
Research the returns of different allocation models across a variety of historical market conditions to see the impact of tweaks to your clients' portfolio mixes.

Easily generate portfolio comparisons in just four clicks
Save comparisons to your personal library











Share with clients
Intuitive controls make it easy to create shareholder-approved reports customized for your clients.

Download, save, and print client proposals
Email directly to your clients from the application











Build out your library of custom charts
Generate individual and custom portfolio comparisons, build a personal chart library, and save to keep your research organized.

Use the platform you prefer: desktop or iPad
Save charts with custom names organized into custom folders












Powered by Morningstar.
All information presented in this tool is for informational purposes only and is not intended to be investment advice. The information is not meant to be an offer to sell or a recommendation to buy any investment product.
All funds involve risk, and you can lose money. See the prospectus for details.
Your clients should carefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges, and expenses of a fund before investing. For a prospectus, or a summary prospectus if available, containing this and other information for any fund, please call Putnam Dealer Marketing Services at 1-800-354-4000. Your clients should read the prospectus carefully before investing.
For complete fund data and performance as of the most recent calendar quarter-end, click the "Prospectus" button.
All information is historical and not indicative of future results. Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. After-sales-charge returns reflect the maximum sales charge applicable to the fund. Performance may not reflect any expense limitation or subsidies currently in effect. Short-term trading fees may apply. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit Morningstar.com.
This material is for informational and educational purposes only. It is not a recommendation of any specific investment product, strategy, or decision. It is not intended to suggest taking or refraining from any course of action, nor is it customized to address the needs, circumstances and objectives of any specific investor. In providing this material, Putnam is not providing impartial advice in a fiduciary capacity. The material is part of Putnam’s sales and marketing activities. Putnam earns fees when clients select its products and services. Investors should consult a professional advisor before making investment and financial decisions.
Not FDIC insured | May lose value | No bank guarantee
© 2011-2017, Putnam Retail Management











 



Mutual Funds - Putnam Investments


































Putnam Investments - Individual Investors


Login
About Putnam
Contact Us










 



Email
Facebook
Twitter
Google+
LinkedIn


Home
Mutual funds




Putnam Mutual Funds




Managed strategies for pursuing your goals

At Putnam, both traditional and alternative strategies are inspired by our independent approach to investment research. We look for value beyond mainstream benchmark indexes, pursue new drivers of return, and take a broader view of market risk with the goal of reducing volatility.

Explore our products to build a diversified portfolio.



Top 5 most viewed funds

Capital Spectrum Fund
Diversified Income Trust
Equity Spectrum Fund
Equity Income Fund
Dynamic Asset Allocation Balanced Fund










Fund Search:









|Filter



Clear all
Close



Absolute Return
Asset Allocation
Blend
Global Sector
Growth
Taxable Income
Tax-free Income
Value

Morningstar Ratings (5-year)









Above-Lipper Median



Annualized Returns (before sales charge)
between



%


and



%



Time period


10 yrs./Life
5 yrs.
3 yrs.
1 yr.




Portfolio Managers

All Portfolio Managers
Aaron M. Cooper, CFA 
Adrian H. Chan, CFA 
Albert Chan, CFA 
Andrew J. Yoon CFA
Anthony J. Daigle 
Brett S. Kozlowski, CFA 
Christopher J. Eitzmann 
D. William Kohli 
Daniel J. Graña, CFA 
Daniel Schiff 
Darren A. Jaroch, CFA 
David L. Diamond, CFA 
David L. Glancy 
Di Yao 
Elizabeth Hansen McGuire 
Emily E. Shanks 
Eric N. Harthun, CFA 
Garrett L. Hamilton, CFA 
Gerard P. Sullivan 
Isabel Buccellati 
Jacquelyne J. Cavanaugh 
James A. Fetch 
James A. Polk, CFA 
Jason R. Vaillancourt, CFA 
Jatin Misra PhD, CFA
Jeffrey B. Sacknowitz, CFA 
Joanne M. Driscoll, CFA 
Jonathan M. Topper 
Joshua H. Fillman 
Karan S. Sodhi, CFA 
Kathryn B. Lakin 
Michael J. Atkin 
Michael J. Lima, CFA 
Michael J. Maguire, CFA 
Michael V. Salm 
Neil P. Desai 
Norman P. Boucher 
Paul D. Scanlon, CFA 
Paul M. Drury, CFA 
Robert J. Kea, CFA 
Robert J. Schoen 
Robert L. Davis, CFA 
Robert L. Salvin 
Robert M. Brookby 
Ryan W. Kauppila 
Samuel Cox 
Shep Perkins, CFA 
Simon Davis 
Spencer Morgan, CFA 
Vivek Gandhi, CFA 
Walter D. Scully, CPA 
William C. Rives 
William J. Monroe, CFA 



Viewing:  




Share Class



A
B
C
M
R
R5
R6
T1
Y




Annualized Returns as of 06/30/17
Cumulative Returns as of 06/30/17
Volatility & Risk (A and Y shares only)
Profile
Morningstar Ratings
Lipper Rankings
Up-market Capture Ratio (A and Y shares only)
Down-market Capture Ratio (A and Y shares only)
Information Ratio (A and Y shares only)


Before sales charge
After sales charge




Please note: B Shares are closed to new investors



 
Fund 
Ticker 
Asset Class 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
Beta 
R2 
Std. Dev. 
Sharpe Ratio 
Alpha 
Expense Ratio 
Total Assets ($m) 
Turnover Ratio 
Overall 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
10 yrs. / Life 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 
1 yr. 
3 yrs. 
5 yrs. 








‡ As of May 8, 2017, Putnam High Yield Advantage Fund was renamed to Putnam High Yield Fund.

Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com. Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Returns before sales charge do not reflect the current maximum sales charges as indicated below. Had the sales charge been reflected, returns would be lower. Returns at public offering price (after sales charge) for class A and class M shares reflect the current maximum initial sales charges of 5.75% and 3.50% for equity funds and Putnam Absolute Return 500 Fund and 700 Fund, and 4.00% and 3.25% for income funds (1.00% and 0.75% for Putnam Floating Rate Income Fund and Putnam Absolute Return 100 Fund and 300 Fund), respectively. Class B share returns reflect the applicable contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC), which is 5% in the first year, declining to 1% in the sixth year, and is eliminated thereafter (except for Putnam Floating Rate Income Fund, which is 3% in the first year, declining to 1% in the fourth year, and is eliminated thereafter). Class C shares reflect a 1% CDSC the first year that is eliminated thereafter. Performance for class B, C, M, R, T, and Y shares prior to their inception is derived from the historical performance of class A shares, adjusted for the applicable sales charge (or CDSC) and, except for class Y shares, the higher operating expenses for such shares (with the exception of Putnam Tax-Free High Yield Fund and Putnam AMT-Free Municipal Fund, which are based on the historical performance of class B shares). Performance for class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. Class A, M, and T shares of Putnam money market funds have no initial sales charge. For a portion of the periods, some funds had expense limitations or had been sold on a limited basis with limited assets and expenses, without which returns would be lower.


For each fund with at least a three-year history, Morningstar calculates a Morningstar Rating based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a fund's monthly performance (including the effects of sales charges, loads, and redemption fees), placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of funds in each category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. (Each share class is counted as a fraction of one fund within this scale and rated separately, which may cause slight variations in the distribution percentages.) The Overall Morningstar Rating for a fund is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its 3–, 5–, and 10–year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. Data is historical. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.


Lipper rankings are based on total return without sales charge relative to all share classes of funds with similar objectives as determined by Lipper. Past performance is not indicative of future results. Rankings for other periods can be found on the Facts & Rankings tab.
















